_	The cathedral has a secluded Gothic cloister where 13 white geese are kept, the number explained by the assertion that Eulalia was 13 when she was martyred.
_	Their analysis of the site was that it would not be profitable, based upon the assertion that; "people in council houses do not spend money on DIY".
_	Bosnian genocide denial is the act of denying the planned systematic genocide or the assertion that the Bosnian genocide, planned and perpetrated by Serb academic, political and military establishment against Bosniak Muslim population of Bosnia and Herzegovina, did not occur in the manner or to the extent described by scholarship and established by the ICTY and the ICJ through its judgments.
_	The Protestant and Roman Catholic churches criticise the following doctrinal points, which have not yet been rejected: the assertion that the New Apostolic apostle ministry corresponds with that of the Primitive Church, and the doctrine that genuine kinship to God can only be received by the New Apostolic apostle ministry.
_	Gerboldt denied the assertion that her parents named her "Katarina" in honor of Katarina Witt, and stated that her parents had indeed wanted her to become a sportswoman, but not specifically a figure skater.
_	in Egypt, Sayyid Qutb popularized the term in his influential work "Ma'alim fi al-Tariq" "Milestones", which included the assertion that "the Muslim community has been extinct for a few centuries.
_	He was recommended by W. F. Bach as the successor to his post at Dresden in April 1746, with the assertion that he had studied keyboard and composition with his father, but was not awarded the appointment.
_	Much later, in the 19th century, the "Sfas Emes", a Hasidic rebbe, made the assertion that it was actually Abraham’s deeds that became Torah.
_	It was followed by the previously taped interview with chief steward Binford with Chris Economaki, with the assertion that video would be reviewed overnight, and that Unser was likely to be penalized.
_	The Maronite Church, however, rejects the assertion that the Maronites were ever monothelites or apart from the Roman Catholic Church; and the question remains a matter of controversy.
_	Protesters objected to the notion that a nuclear war was survivable, and answered with the assertion that the only way to survive a nuclear war was for one not to happen at all.
_	Common to all these notions was the assertion that present generations have a higher and better understanding of divine will, and they can and should unwaveringly change and refashion religious precepts.
_	Although the assertion that ethnographic fieldwork can be meaningfully applied to computer-mediated interactions has been contested, it is increasingly becoming accepted.
_	Since the alleged death of Vicki Johnson, Anthony has seemingly vanished and has not been in contact with any of his previous supporters, lending credence to the assertion that he never existed.
_	In 2003's "Freedom of Commercial Expression", Roger Shiner points out that what was remarkable about the "Posadas" decision was the way in which the Court applied "Central Hudson", not requesting any evidence that the restrictions were necessary to protect state interest in public wellbeing, but simply accepting that the assertion that it "might" be necessary and useful was reasonable.
_	This data alone however may not support the assertion that the country is more punitive than in the past.
_	The sixteenth, Minoru Tanaka, was added to the list on April 27, 2005, following discovery of evidence supporting the assertion that he was abducted.
_	In discussing boundaries of manifolds or simplexes and their simplicial complexes, one often meets the assertion that the boundary of the boundary is always empty.
_	Kahn recruited Jenna with the assertion that Charlotte left enough money in her will to afford Marshall another eye surgery.
_	In his work on the myth systems of primitive tribes, working from the analogy of language structure, he adopted the French term "mythème", with the assertion that the system of meaning within mythic utterances parallels closely that of a language system.
_	Veitch responded to this criticism with the assertion that "it is not a sin to be attractive or dress cute," and that the photographs were intended to persuade women in the sex industry to dismiss the idea that Christianity is about "being locked up in a house with a Bible."
_	Their declaration partly rested on the assertion that, on certain occasions, Palestinians were expelled from their homes in Israel.
_	It functioned to highlight the special qualities of both writers, and it especially powered the assertion that natural genius trumps rules, that "there is always an appeal open from criticism to nature" (Samuel Johnson).
_	Phylogenetic analysis supports the assertion that the ratites are polyphyletic and do not represent a valid grouping of birds.
_	Investigators chose to show that wealthy children from the Kern Place area also had high levels of lead in their blood in order to combat the assertion that only poor, uneducated El Pasoans were being affected by the problem.
_	Robert Reimer asserts that a central theme of the film is the assertion that "Jews have always lived in the ghettos and in fact they "choose" to live this way."
_	Perspectives range from the assertion that all abductions are hoaxes to the belief that the claims are of objective happenings and separate from the consciousness of the claimants.
_	He notes that the various streams of the evidence which support the assertion that this influence reached the Philippines include: ""Syllabic writing; artifacts in the form of different figurines made of clay, gold, and bronze that were dug in various sites in the Philippines; and 336 loanwords identified by Professor Francisco to be Sanskrit in origin, with 150 of them identified as the origin of some major Philippine terms."
_	If the partial derivative with respect to formula_2 is denoted with a subscript formula_3, then the symmetry is the assertion that the second-order partial derivatives formula_4 satisfy the identity
_	The coaches said they had not, lending credence to the assertion that Cooper was the first collegiate player to make use of the offensive innovation.
_	When this story appeared in the "Glasgow Herald" in 1867, it was soon disputed with the assertion that everyone understood the rye to be a field of rye, wet with dew, which also fits better with other stanzas that substitute "wheat" and "grain" for "rye".
_	The condition that ψ be harmonic is equivalent to the assertion that the tensor formula_192 must be trace free on every pair of indices.
_	Thus, the assertion that there is no master plan is factually wrong.
_	Subsequently, Barr Laboratories and Novopharm Ltd. also challenged the patent, in part based on the assertion that NCI scientists Samuel Broder, Hiroaki Mitsuya, and Robert Yarchoan should have been named as inventors, and those two companies applied to the FDA to sell AZT as a generic drug.
_	For instance, Goldbach's conjecture is the assertion that every even number (greater than 2) is the sum of two prime numbers.
_	Projective determinacy is the assertion that every two-player perfect information game with moves being integers, game length ω and projective payoff set is determined, that is one of the players has a winning strategy.
_	The notion of "strong convergence" formalizes the assertion that the measure of each measurable set should converge:
_	While speaking as a guest on BBC 6 Music on 18 December 2007, she cast doubt on the assertion that the character's first name was Aloysius, stating that he was "only ever 'Nosey' Parker".
_	The Irenaean theodicy has been challenged with the assertion that many evils do not seem to promote spiritual growth, and can be positively destructive of the human spirit.
_	Pan's account included the assertion that she used oxytocin to assist in the birth (an impossibility, Falun Gong sources point out, because oxytocin was not synthesized until the following year).
_	His claim is based on the assertion that he received poor legal advice that resulted in his guilty plea and that he has always maintained his innocence, despite his admission of guilt during his sentencing hearing.
_	While praised by many who sought an end to violence and to forge peace and development, the accord was seen by others as compromising the territorial integrity of Bangladesh and the assertion that the Chittagong Hill Tracts were an inalienable part of the country.
_	He also makes the assertion that non-Muslims living in Muslim countries suffer legalised oppression that stems from teachings in the Qur'an.
_	One reason for this is the assertion that the Bertelsmann Stiftung does not completely separate its nonprofit activities from the company's commercial interests.
_	Grow the Pie is an expression used in macroeconomics to refer to the assertion that growing the economy of a nation as a whole creates more availability of wealth and work opportunities than does redistribution of wealth.
_	Afterwards, the conspirators met and made the assertion that none of the sons of Emperor Hui was actually his.
_	So far research has provided support for the assertion that nature connectedness (at a subjective level) is a reliable predictor of environmental behaviors.
_	The U.S. government disputed the assertion that most of the detainees had fled their country due to political persecution, alleging instead that they were "economic migrants".
_	In the general context of a "G"-valued series, a distinction is made between absolute and unconditional convergence, and the assertion that a real or complex series which is not absolutely convergent is necessarily conditionally convergent (meaning not unconditionally convergent) is then a theorem, not a definition.
_	Special attention is given to the assertion that Luther, some three-hundred years before the dogmatization of the Immaculate Conception by Pope Pius IX in 1854, was a firm adherent of that view.
_	Less likely is the assertion that outside weathering conditions created the stresses.
_	Specifically, the polling found that 19% of Americans answered "probably true" to the assertion that "Jews have too much control/influence on Wall Street" while 15% concurred with the related statement that Jews seem "more willing to use shady practices" in business.
_	Some criticism centres on the assertion that members of G8 do not do enough to help global problems, due to strict patent policy and other issues related to globalization.
_	Responding to the assertion that Congress did not have power to revoke a person's citizenship without his or her assent, Harlan predicted that "Until the Court indicates with greater precision what it means by 'assent', today's opinion will surely cause still greater confusion in this area of the law."
_	Changes in the later editions include removing the assertion that the risk of sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS) is not heightened by placing the baby to sleep on its belly, and removing the notion that feeding the baby whenever it appears hungry will give the mother "an abnormal hormonal condition" which could lead to postpartum depression.
_	The claim of descent from Menelik I is based on the assertion that the kings of Axum were also the descendants of Menelik I; its definitive and best-known formulation is set forth in the "Kebra Nagast".
_	The Freudenthal magic square includes all of the exceptional Lie groups apart from "G", and it provides one possible approach to justify the assertion that "the exceptional Lie groups all exist because of the octonions":
_	The decision rested on the assertion that minimum resale price maintenance is indistinguishable in economic effect from naked horizontal price fixing by a cartel.
_	He sought to quash it on the assertion that his plea agreement prevented his being forced to testify before the Virginia grand jury.
_	Dr. Robert Smith, in an article examining patronage in the early history of NASA, begins with the assertion that “the history of space astronomy is usually written from the perspective of the remarkable scientific findings garnered by space astronomers and the ways these findings have enriched and guided new views of the universe.”
_	More recent research, however, contradicts the assertion that heterosexual women are largely monogamous.
_	Did not Lloyd George just the other day make the assertion that Europe was worse off than ever?
_	The Riemann conjecture is equivalent to the assertion that the Hamiltonian is Hermitian, or equivalently that formula_6 is real.
_	That he continued on the Court as an Associate Justice for years afterward lends weight to the assertion that Cushing declined promotion.
_	The four color theorem is equivalent to the assertion that every planar cubic bridgeless graph admits a Tait coloring.
_	With respect to the second option presented, some historians disagree with the assertion that London gained its degree awarding powers before Durham, and others have noted that there was uncertainty at the time as to whether or not Durham had degree awarding powers stemming from its founding Act of Parliament, which was cleared up by it obtaining a royal charter.
_	Conor Gearty found behind its "beguiling cosmopolitanism" traces of American exceptionalism: "many will balk at the assertion that the 'reason why the United States is not itself a terrorist state even though its warfare brings suffering and destruction to many innocent persons, including civilians, is that it acts within the law.'"
_	The large number of light engine movements would naturally increase the total amount of traffic at Hawes Junction, but Pringle's report specifically rejected the assertion that overwork was a factor.
_	Representatives of both Muslim and Jewish communities, citing scientific studies, dispute the assertion that traditional "halal" and kosher slaughtering methods lead to unnecessary animal suffering.
_	German protests that forcing POWs to clear mines was against international law, article 32 of the Geneva conventions, were rejected with the assertion that the Germans were not POWs; they were disarmed forces who had surrendered unconditionally ("avvæpnede styrker som hadde overgitt seg betingelsesløst").
_	Judge Hartman denied the state's request on July 23, 2014; he dismissed the assertion that the state supreme court's stay of "Brinkman" is binding on Boulder County as "an improper circular argument".
_	In modern Scandinavian linguistic research, the assertion that Old Scanian was a Swedish dialect before the Swedish acquisition of most of old Skåneland is now seldom argued by linguistic scholars, although the comparative and historical research efforts continue.
_	"The evidence simply doesn’t support the assertion that the historic use of PCB products was the cause of the plaintiffs’ harms.
_	Both physicists and philosophers have often repeated the assertion that the geodesic equation can be obtained from the field equations to describe the motion of a gravitational singularity, but this claim remains disputed.
_	While not an original source "per se", the antiquity of the compiled list supports the assertion that Pehthelm was the first bishop at Whithorn, and contradicts later assertions (discussed below) that he was the second bishop.
_	Gossen's Second “Law”, named for Hermann Heinrich Gossen (1810–1858), is the assertion that an economic agent will allocate his or her expenditures such that the ratio of the marginal utility of each good or service to its price (the marginal expenditure necessary for its acquisition) is equal to that for every other good or service.
_	In macroeconomics, particularly in the history of economic thought, the Treasury view is the assertion that fiscal policy has "no" effect on the total amount of economic activity and unemployment, even during times of economic recession.
_	Among the various criticisms it receives, one of the most recurrent is the assertion that it could discourage the search for employment, encouraging laziness of people.
_	In public policy debates, the assertion that there exists a consensus of scientists in a particular field is often used as an argument for the validity of a theory and as support for a course of action by those who stand to gain from a policy based on that consensus.
_	These characteristics include the Walter Mitty effect (i.e., the assertion that individuals will exhibit high levels of a given trait in TAT stories that do not match their overt behavior because TAT responses may represent how a person wishes they were, not how they truly are) and the inhibition effect (i.e., the assertion that individuals will "not" exhibit high levels of a trait in TAT responses because they are repressing that trait).
_	These historians base their hypothesis on the assertion that the Confucian virtue of monarchical loyalty was unconditional and absolute in 19th-century Vietnam.
_	The pan-Dongyi pan-Northeast Asian arguments of the "sahwa" included the assertion that the Korean nation included "not only the Korean peninsula and Manchuria, but also northeastern China", considering the Emperors of Shun, Liao, Jin, Yuan, and Qing as part of Korean history.
_	One day, RSA might be proved secure, as it relies on the assertion that factoring large numbers is hard, thus becoming unconditionally secure, but it will never be information-theoretically secure because even if no efficient algorithms for factoring large primes exist, it could still be done in principle with unlimited computational power.
_	As well, Biletzki suggested that controversial statements made by Prime Minister Benjamin Netenyahu in the days before the election, specifically the assertion that a two-state solution would never happen during his tenure, and an expression of anxiety that supposedly large amounts of Israeli Arabs were voting, represent implicit norms of "Zionist, Jewish Israel."
_	However, according to the Australian War Memorial, there is little empirical evidence to support the assertion that the history of the flag as indicated in the news report and the accompanying plaque.
_	Despite the fact that people have been performing brachial plexus blocks for over a hundred years, there is as yet no clear evidence to support the assertion that one method of nerve localization is better than another.
_	Many reference sources in the past century or so have repeated the assertion that the Chironomidae do not feed as adults, but an increasing body of evidence contradicts this view.
_	It is opposed to the assertion that consciousness results exclusively from properties of specific types of matter, e.g. brain tissue.
_	Others have criticized the assertion that men universally preferred women with a waist-to-hip ratio of 0.7 or the "hourglass" figure.
_	The matching requirement is based on the assertion that total program expenses are 100% and that, although the federal government provides assistance for most of those expenses, the recipient must still cover a portion of them.
_	The outcome of these investigations often rested on the assertion that Allied cryptanalysis could only break Enigma messages using pure statistical methods, which the Allies did not use for each possible combination.
_	In the European Values Study (EVS) of 2008, the percentage of Bulgarian respondents who agreed with the assertion that "Marriage is an outdated institution" was 27.2%.
_	One item that seemed to have annoyed him was the assertion that he had based the character of Paul Dombey ("Dombey and Son") on Thomas Chapman, one of the principal partners at John Chapman & Co. Dickens immediately sent a letter to Lewis Gaylord Clark, editor of the New York literary magazine "The Knickerbocker", saying that Powell was a forger and thief.
_	They base their thesis on the assertion that the said church appears several times in documents from the 10th century, and that its location was more thoroughly described, as in 956 when it was described as being in a forest near the "Cheuilinbahc" (a brook now called the Kohlbach, and also likely the old name for Kübelberg, but certainly not for Schwedelbach).
_	Remarkable in his work is the assertion that money is not something invented by government authority, which was the popular view of government authorities at the time.
_	UNICA disagreed with the assertion that indirect land-use changes can be accurately calculated with the current methodologies.
_	This is a repetition of information known from earlier sources, except that the assertion that Pehthelm was Aldhelm's disciple (or pupil) is William's own characterisation.
_	Kessler added that the assertion that the FISA warrant was to examine possible activity between two Russian banks and a computer server in Trump Tower had not been confirmed by U.S. news organisations, and that the Trump Organisation server communicating with Russian banks may have actually been located in Philadelphia, not Trump Tower.
_	His wonderful escape is accounted for by the assertion that the result of a lizard's bite depends upon which reaches water first, the man or the lizard; if the former, the latter dies; if the latter, the former dies.
_	Notice that the statement being proved must include the assertion that the prover has such knowledge (otherwise, the statement would not be proved in zero-knowledge, since at the end of the protocol the verifier would gain the additional information that the prover has knowledge of the required secret information).
_	The video shows the band in Apollo-era space suits on the Moon, with shots of other cultures acting like stereotypical Americans and some using American-owned products such as cigarettes, with the assertion that American culture is everywhere.
_	Many Croats continued to regard Gotovina as a war hero and rejected the assertion that he was guilty of crimes.
_	Romney's campaign later clarified that he would not sign because language in the pledge made the assertion that African American children born into slavery in 1860 were better off than children raised today.
_	Velius also rejects the assertion that the name's origin is Dampter Horn: a neighbourhood of the village Dampten, which flooded and had fallen into disuse.
_	Allen wrote two books on Adolf Hitler debunking the assertion that he came to power through violence.
_	For any statements "S" and "N", the assertion that ""N" is necessary for "S"" is equivalent to the assertion that ""S" is sufficient for "N"".
_	His autobiography ends with the assertion that he had been the tutor of Neferure, daughter of Hatshepsut.
_	Conor Gearty supports the assertion that private nuisance is confused, and also claims that private nuisance is significantly different from public nuisance; "they have little in common except the accident of sharing the same name...
_	Shaun's sudden and somewhat unexpected promotion to the book's central character in Part III is explained by Tindall with the assertion that "having disposed of old HCE, Shaun is becoming the new HCE."
_	Godin first makes the assertion that "being the best in the world is seriously underrated," although he defines the term 'best' as "best for them based on what they believe and what they know," and 'world' as "the world they have access to."
_	A letter to the editor of The Argus in February 1881 made the assertion that 'the market traffic should never have been removed' to the Queen Victoria Market and that the decision to do so 'was the result of a deep-laid scheme of log-rolling at the expense of the ratepayers'.
_	Clashes between Whitburn and Smethurst (who had left the programme in 1986) became publicly known in 1996, with the former accusing Smethurst of "fluffy and frothy" Conservative propaganda, and the latter retaliating with the assertion that Whitburn had "no understanding of the countryside" and the serial under her had become "badly written feminist tripe".
_	These statements all support the assertion that the spirit is Trask, as his posting to the Egyptian Army would likely have seen him in Cairo, while his death is well documented as occurring during the Dongolese Expedition of 1896.
_	However, references to the Redbone community and its members in 19th century newspapers tend to be wildly divergent, ranging from making no mention of racial makeup, to stating that the members were white, to stating that the members were African American to stating that the members were of Indian extraction to the assertion that the members were of unspecified mixed race.
_	A relatively weak formulation is the assertion that the motion of matter in one place should affect which frames are inertial in another.
_	This puts in question the assertion that the castle was conquered in 1148, as it is claimed by historian Frei António Brandão ("Monarchia Lusitana", 1632), which is also improbable in context of the Conquest of Santarém, and Lisbon since 1147 when the line of Muslim defences was pushed to river Sado.
_	Sachs’ entire approach stands on the assertion that abject poverty could be ended worldwide by 2025.
_	Despite the dramatic nature of this divine intervention, Faustus disregards the inscription with the assertion that he is already damned by his actions thus far and therefore left with no place to which he could flee.
_	Strongly alluding to Thomas Jefferson's text throughout, the Rhodesians used one phrase verbatim—"a respect for the opinions of mankind"—but no reference was made to the assertion that "all men are created equal", nor to the "consent of the governed", two omissions later stressed by a number of commentators.
_	Cooper, a former "Nation" columnist, attacked the assertion that Al Sadr represented mainstream Iraqi sentiment and that American forces had brought the fight to the holy city of Najaf.
_	He also quotes paleographer Christopher Rollston for the assertion that the relative height of some letters is incorrect.
_	During the trial, Deckert's lawyer, Ludwig Boch, based the defence upon the assertion that the Holocaust was a "legend" invented by the Jews.
_	This is due to their prey-drive, their speed, and the assertion that Greyhounds have no road sense.
_	JVP rejects the assertion that BDS is inherently anti-Semitic, and we encourage discussion both within our own community and outside of it of the growing BDS movement."
_	The screen is marketed by Apple as the "Retina display", based on the assertion that a display of approximately 300 ppi at a distance of from one's eye, or 57 arcseconds per pixel is the maximum amount of detail that the human retina can perceive.
_	The DHS rule explicitly rejects the assertion that the implementation of the Real ID Act will lead to violations of the citizens' individual constitutional rights (page 5284 of the DHS rule in the Federal Register).
_	Young concludes the paper with the assertion that these constraints are the result of living in a patriarchal, and sexist society.
_	For example, the assertion that there was little possession of material goods in Sparta – a part of the 'Spartan Mirage' – is disproved by Alcman's observation of various women wearing gold chains.
_	Diffeomorphisms are the true symmetry transformations of general relativity, and come about from the assertion that the formulation of the theory is based on a bare differentiable manifold, but not on any prior geometry — the theory is background-independent (this is a profound shift, as all physical theories before general relativity had as part of their formulation a prior geometry).
_	Matilda was said to have a wonderful faculty of telling fortunes, when she pleased, and remarkable powers as a mesmerist, both qualities being explained by the assertion that they were handed down to her as the eldest daughter in the Stanley family, and were secrets possessed by her alone.
_	The study "Antisemitic images and attitudes in Sweden", conducted by Henrik Bachner and Jonas Ring, revealed that 1.4 percent of the population disagrees with the assertion that "Most Jews are probably decent folks".
_	J.P.Das’s characters re-validate the assertion that the authentic re-appropriation of one’s cultural space remains by and large one of the most critical unfinished agendas of our time."
_	He also explains that section 203 of the Act expressly limits disclosure to foreign intelligence information, which is limited to threats from abroad, and disputes the assertion that all information is required to be shared between agencies.
_	It had been forgotten in the feudal era, and the assertion that the French crown can only be transmitted to and through males made it unique and exalted in the eyes of the French.
_	He rebutted the assertion that TFI initiated or funded The Path to 9/11.
_	Moral philosopher Peter Singer, disputing the perspective that "God is good" and could never advocate something like torture, states that those who propose this are "caught in a trap of their own making, for what can they possibly mean by the assertion that God is good?
_	Smiley countered with the assertion that he had offered the story—an interview with Sara Jane Olson, an alleged former member of the Symbionese Liberation Army—to CBS, which, along with BET, was owned by Viacom.
_	Thus Kant defines "idealism" as "the assertion that we can never be certain whether all of our putative outer experience is not mere imagining".
_	This research was frequently cited to support the assertion that women are less intelligent than men.
_	As in the 1930s, Qasim based Iraq's claim on the assertion that Kuwait had been a district of the Ottoman province of Basra, unjustly severed by the British from the main body of Iraqi state when it had been created in the 1920s.
_	The nature of the conversation and comments gave credence to the assertion that the entire interview was staged to benefit Malik Riaz by asking guided questions to give Riaz the opportunity to malign the then Chief Justice.
_	Special attention is given to the assertion that Luther, some three-hundred years before the dogmatization of the Immaculate Conception by Pope Pius IX in 1854, was a firm adherent of that view.
_	A controversial aspect of the philosophy concerns the assertion that men and women could change from homosexuality through studying its principles.
_	Such claims are joined to the assertion that survivors have, with the passing of time, confused what they saw with their own eyes in the camp.
_	This was based on the assertion that he became a big landowner on the Pannonian-Dacian frontiers, the future Hungary and part of Romania, that his descendants continued to live there for the following 1400 years, and that the Hunyadis were his ultimate descendants – for which there is scant if any historical evidence.
_	The notion of "total variation convergence" formalizes the assertion that the measure of all measurable sets should converge "uniformly", i.e. for every formula_10 there exists "N"
_	Several studies involving hypothetical and small monetary payoffs, and recently involving health outcomes, have supported the assertion that when presented with a choice between 1A and 1B, most people would choose 1A.
_	In 1944, Teague successfully defended the assertion that industrial design was a profession, citing its contributions to the public good before the appeals court in New York State, setting a national precedent.
_	However, there is an apparent contradiction, since in Kabbalah, the sefirot are sometimes called divine in themselves, despite the assertion that they are only vehicles to manifest God.
_	A central theme is the assertion that all adoptees, even those adopted at birth, will retain memories of the separation from their birth mothers, and that regardless of the way the adoption is presented and handled by adoptive parents, these memories will have profound effects on the emotional and psychological well-being of the child and adult adoptee.
_	Firstly, Daniel J. Bernstein disputes the assertion that no previous attack on the 10,000-bit LFSR-based stream cipher existed, and claims that the attack on reduced-round Trivium "doesn't give any real reason to think that (the full) Trivium can be attacked".
_	She proposes that: "Unless or until evidence comes to light of its wide use by Zionist publications and organizations, the assertion that 'a land without a people for a people without a land' was a 'widely-propagated Zionist slogan' should be retired".
_	and in their analysis of NOFX's attitude, the authors of "Screaming for Change: Articulating a Unifying Philosophy of Punk Rock" state: "..the fact that none of the songs on the record deal with animals, zoos, or even bestiality, supports the assertion that the artwork contains little, if any, significant meaning other than portraying images the band is confident will upset and shock the establishment."
_	In contrast to individual-collective dichotomy proposed by Peterson and contemporaries, critics suggest that both are necessarily connected and intertwined, rejecting the assertion that they exist in a mutually exclusive relationship.
_	And I can state emphatically, regardless of Anne's beliefs, that the assertion that our mother knew about such behavior is absolutely false."
_	However, the assertion that rounders is the direct ancestor of baseball is more problematic, for chronological reasons: the earliest mention of the game, by that name at least, dates only to 1828, almost a century after the earliest mentions of "base ball" and well after "base ball" was being played in America.
_	Hence, it is a logical theorem of first-order logic that something exists — usually expressed as the assertion that something is identical to itself, ∃x(x=x).
_	Despite receiving a patent and some financial backing from Murray residents, and the assertion that "while messages have been sent for distances less than ten miles, he is confident that with his machine he can talk across the Atlantic", Stubblefield made no headway in commercializing his latest invention.
_	In the book, Solomon questions the assertion that the “science is settled”, which he believes is claimed by advocates of the "consensus theory" and criticizes the "alarmist" view on global warming.
_	This was intended to be a purely symbolic measure, meaningless except to remind Russians of the assertion that Yeltsin had overridden the will of the people in breaking-up the Soviet Union.
_	Thus, Hedetniemi's conjecture amounts to the assertion that tensor products can't be colored with an unexpectedly small number of colors.
_	Foras na Gaeilge, the official governing body of the Irish language, did not support the assertion that 'cuil' means 'knowledge'.
_	Cain addressed the assertion that his ultimate goal is to land a TV show, like former candidate Mike Huckabee did after his failed 2008 presidential run.
_	The State will not give up control over these things easily, for the assertion that the importance of marriage makes it a legitimate interest of the State is only true from the point of view of the State itself, for as the foundation of society, marriage and family cannot be entrusted to governments just to be blown about by the winds of democratic opinion, for the same government that has the power to protect can just as easily destroy.
_	The Bush administration based its rationale for the war principally on the assertion that Iraq, which had been viewed by the U.S. as a rogue state since the Persian Gulf War, possessed weapons of mass destruction (WMDs) and that the Iraqi government posed an immediate threat to the United States and its coalition allies.
_	Children in a particular country are not genetically predisposed to speak the languages of that country, adding further weight to the assertion that genetic memory is not Lamarckian.
_	UCL's claim is also opposed by the assertion that it surrendered its claim to University status when it accepted a royal charter as a college in 1836, under the name "University College, London".
_	Cavanaugh challenges this conventional wisdom, arguing that there is a "myth of religious violence", basing his argument on the assertion that "attempts to separate religious and secular violence are incoherent".
_	In 1969, Stonehouse was subjected to the assertion that he was a Czechoslovak secret service agent.
_	Recent statistics support the assertion that Israel may be living on the ‘fruits of the past’, that is to say, on the heavy investment made in primary, secondary and tertiary education during the 1950s, 1960s and 1970s.
_	If the wholeness axiom is consistent, then it is also consistent to add to the wholeness axiom the assertion that all sets are hereditarily ordinal definable.
_	The author noted circumstantial evidence which, in his opinion, suggested that Molly Childers might have been the spy, including the assertion that Childers had not shared her husband's enthusiasm for Irish independence, and the spy's use of American phraseology.
_	Polling data in the Arab world suggests that Arab public opinion largely rejects the assertion that U.S. democracy assistance is helpful.
_	Some regard his choice of writing "Guan Zhui Bian" (Limited Views) in classical Chinese as a challenge to the assertion that classical Chinese is incompatible with modern and Western ideas, an assertion often heard during the May Fourth Movement.
_	In Hartmann's analysis, he wrote to the Condon Committee that "This is one of the few UFO reports in which all factors investigated, geometric, psychological, and physical, appear to be consistent with the assertion that an extraordinary flying object, silvery, metallic, disk-shaped, tens of meters in diameter, and evidently artificial, flew within sight of two witnesses."
_	Photographs from the wreck also debunked the assertion that she had one of her turrets removed in an early 1944 refit.
_	Allied to these criticisms is the assertion that Hartshorne over-emphasizes aesthetics and is correspondingly weak on ethics and morality.
_	We can advance the assertion that at the base of all Racial Science there is no concept of "human being" in contradistinction to animals separated by any physical or mental trait; the only existing differentiation is between Nordic man, on the one hand, and animals as a whole, including all non-Nordic human beings, or sub-men, who are transitional forms of development.
_	Most major Christian denominational leaders in the country publicly rejected UDI and the assertion that it defended Christianity, with the exception of the local Dutch Reformed Church, which stated that it was apolitical and thereafter refrained from comment.
_	The phrase is used particularly in the assertion that the economy of China could overtake the economy of the United States as the largest national economy in the world, a position it held from 1500 to 1830 A.D.
_	The charges also included the assertion that fresh, non-frozen embryos were used each time.
_	It has been argued under physicalism that one must either believe that anyone including oneself might be a zombie, or that no one can be a zombie—following from the assertion that one's own conviction about being (or not being) a zombie is a product of the physical world and is therefore no different from anyone else's.
_	The argument includes the assertion that they may serve as a de facto tax which can have a result of slowing or ending development in an area and instead cause investment in other areas that don't levy impact fees.
_	The claim arises from the assertion that the Articles of Confederation was the first legal document to refer to the colonies as "the United States of America".
_	They also regard as a myth the assertion that Caspian oil and gas will be a cheaper and more secure alternative to supplies from the Persian Gulf.
_	The statement was published in advertisements under an introduction which stated that its signatories dispute the assertion that Darwin's theory of evolution fully explains the complexity of living things, and dispute that "all known scientific evidence supports [Darwinian] evolution".
_	Ward states his view that the assertion that religion does more harm than good ignores "the available evidence from history, from psychology and sociology, and from philosophy" and suggests that proponents of this view "refuse to investigate the question in a properly rigorous way, and substitute rhetoric for analysis".
_	These run from jury confusion and computational complexity to the assertion that standard probability theory is not a normatively satisfactory basis for adjudication of rights.
_	The book has been described as a "necessary ... corrective" of the assertion that bubbles are inevitable in the market system, and contests the notion that the greed of the American consumer was a primary cause of the problem.
_	In 2008, Joyce Chai, United States, won the Stockholm Junior Water Prize for developing a novel technique to quantifying the potential toxicity of silver nanoparticles to the world's water sources and the environment, and in doing so repudiating the assertion that consumer products that contain nanosilver are more reliable and less environmentally hazardous than alternatives.
_	Benedetti emphasises the continuity of the Method of Physical Action with Stanislavski's earlier approaches; Whyman argues that "there is no justification in Stanislavsky's ["sic"] writings for the assertion that the "method of physical actions" represents a rejection of his previous work".
_	For Marx then, an explanation of human nature is an explanation of the needs of humans, together with the assertion that they will act to fulfill those needs.
_	(Roth 1970: 84) The Pharisaic position is exemplified by the assertion that "A learned "mamzer" takes precedence over an ignorant High Priest."
_	When speaking about facts of an unrecorded past, we know well that a given fact either occurred or did not occur, yet without knowing which of the two is true—and therefore we affirm only that the fact may have occurred: so also about the future, either the assertion that a given fact will at some time occur, is positively true, or the assertion that it will never occur, is positively true: the assertion that it may or may not occur some time or other, represents only our ignorance, which of the two is true.
_	Sue White then appears in a tutu, claiming that the patient is stalking Mac, and repeating the assertion that the patient is transgender.
_	It reprinted in two parts a long article by Marcel Crok which had appeared in "Natuurwetenschap & Techniek" under the heading "Proof that mankind causes climate change is refuted, Kyoto protocol based on flawed statistics" and the assertion that the MBH99 finding of exceptional late 20th century warmth was "the central pillar of the Kyoto Protocol", despite the protocol having been adopted in December 1997, before either of the MBH papers had been published.
_	In terms of group theory, the assertion that there are no color singlet gluons is simply the statement that quantum chromodynamics has an SU(3) rather than a U(3) symmetry.
_	"The Leader's Guide" for the 2008 movie "" includes the assertion that more than 700 scientists have signed the statement "A Scientific Dissent From Darwinism" on a page alleging that a largely atheistic scientific establishment was ignoring the facts about intelligent design.
_	One of them involved the assertion that women had no legal right to property acquired via the Donation Land Claim Act.
_	Meer argues that hipster racism is rooted in what she calls "hipster exceptionalism", meaning "the idea that something ordinarily offensive or prejudiced is miraculously transformed into something clever, funny and socially relevant, by the assertion that said ordinarily offensive thing is ironic or satirical."
_	The Corps of Cadets of the United States Military Academy at West Point wear gray parade uniforms, but the assertion that they were adopted in commemoration of Scott’s troops at Chippawa appears to be a legend, possibly started by General Scott himself.
_	This reinforces the assertion that this early course is a masterpiece of disc golf course design.
_	The first edition of Malthus's book claimed a mathematical foundation for the assertion that human population growth always far outstrips the growth of the means to support it, and population can be checked only by "vice and misery".
_	It is one of a family of theorems that quantify the assertion that a pair of geodesics emanating from a point "p" spread apart more slowly in a region of high curvature than they would in a region of low curvature.
_	Legend accounts for the three springs ("fontane") with the assertion that, when severed from Paul's body, his head bounced and struck the earth in three different places, from which fountains sprang up.
_	However, following Churkin's announcement, Western governments said that they had yet to see any evidence that backs up the assertion that anyone besides the Assad regime had the ability to use chemical weapons.
_	It also maintained that "equality of opportunity and equality in law in no way depend, as ethical principles, upon the assertion that human beings are in fact equal in endowment."
_	There are many theories as to their origins, including the assertion that their unusual shapes formed naturally through erosion.
_	Both of these statements point to his being of noble birth, and appear strangely at variance with the assertion that he was a mere professional grammarian "Grammatodidascalus", a statement which Robert Geier conjectures plausibly enough to refer in fact to Marsyas of Philippi.
_	Did federal courts have the authority to hear a case brought against state government officials based on the assertion that those officials were part of a statewide conspiracy to deprive blacks of the right to vote?
_	Historians have been making the assertion that Henry IV was a convinced Calvinist, only changing his formal religious allegiance to adjust, suit or achieve his political goals.
_	The innovation of PLO's Phased Plan was in the assertion that each step which would lead to the fulfillment of these goals would be a worthy step.
_	Hippocrates employed it in medicine, and Pliny ("Nat. Hist." xxiv. 13) ascribes to it extraordinary curative powers, concluding his account of it with the assertion that "the very touch of it mixed with oil of spondylium is sufficient to kill a serpent."
_	The validity of the assertion that groups flourish when guided by effective leaders can be illustrated using several examples.
_	Chiles signed a bill into law that granted each man $500,000 as long as a state administrative judge concurred with the assertion that the state had wronged them.
_	"Der Spiegel" disputed the assertion that Ratjen was a tool of the Nazis, as presented by "Time" and the movie, stating:
_	The only fact that can be adduced in support of the assertion that Grimm wished to deprive Rask of his claims to priority is that he does not expressly mention Rask's results in his second edition.
_	Will contests generally focus on the assertion that the testator lacked testamentary capacity, was operating under an insane delusion, or was subject to undue influence or fraud.
_	The second was around her reiterating the assertion that Charlotte Osei offered sexual favors to Mahama in exchange for her position as Electoral Commission of Ghana chairperson.
_	The significant answers include the assertion that virtuous duty of non-violence, compassion, patience and memory unto others is an act of worship of one's soul (God within).
_	But what many newspapers found interesting was the assertion that this next World's Fair would not require any financial assistance or subsidies from the U.S. government; the only request made by the fair's directors was that the United States erect buildings and exhibits like any other country.
_	PolitiFact.com said the assertion that Rich gave emails to WikiLeaks is a "baseless claim", concluding "Gingrich and others are talking about an unfounded conspiracy theory as if it's a matter of fact.
_	He nevertheless brushes this apparent conflict aside with the assertion that the common core of these various explanations is that they relate to a subjects’ emotional responses to and affinity with other peoples’ emotions and their reactions to those emotions (p. 136).
_	This reasoning was obviously overthrown by the assertion that the mind contained within itself the standard of truth and falsehood; it was also attacked more generally by the argument that all such reasoning refutes itself, since it proceeds upon principles assumed to be true, and then concludes that there can be no certain ground for any assumption at all.
_	Morton wrote that "Scientology officials reject as 'simply false' the assertion that Sea Org women are encouraged, as a matter of policy, to have abortions."
_	The metaphorical image of an author giving birth to a work of fiction is not new, nor is the picture of the “tortured artist”, nor even the assertion that all fiction is thinly veiled biography; in Beckett’s case there are biographical elements embedded throughout all his work and if a writer’s task is to get something out of himself onto the page, that something, that part of himself, could quite poetically be referred to as the twin inside him.
_	In addressing the assertion that Markham's description of Tippit's killer was not consistent with the appearance of Oswald, the Warren Commission stated that they had reviewed the telephone transcript in which she was alleged to have made it.
_	Therefore, the assertion that an object "R" → "R*" is initial in "E", that is, that there is a morphism from it to any other element of "E", means that the ring "R"* is a "most efficient" solution to our problem.
_	Much research rests on the assertion that people think about (other) people differently from non-social targets.
_	For distances beyond that, measures depend upon physical assumptions, that is, the assertion that one recognizes the object in question, and the class of objects is homogeneous enough that its members can be used for meaningful estimation of distance.
_	Making the assertion that something is fact when there is no one powerful enough to hold you accountable — ahem!
_	Found frequently and in long-time error is the assertion that Exterminator started in 100 races.
_	Moving from the assertion that ‘pure knowledge’ is simply not possible (as all forms of knowledge are inevitably influenced by ideological standpoints), Said sought to explain the connection between ideology and literature.
_	The burden of rational-actor theory is the assertion that ‘naturally’ constituted individuals facing existential conflicts over scarce resources would rationally impose on themselves the institutional structures of modern capitalist society, or something approximating them.
_	These are characterized by the assertion that the covariant derivative, which is the sum of the exterior derivative operator "d" and the connection "A", transforms in the adjoint representation of the gauge group "G".
_	Richard Dawkins sees the assertion that the designer does not need to be explained as a thought-terminating cliché.
_	The podcast report concluded with the assertion that Section 23, and the umbrella of associated companies ADV split into, could effectively be thought of as Neo-ADV (referencing how in Mobile Suit Gundam, when the Principality of Zeon was defeated, its remnants reorganized into Neo Zeon).
_	Many forms of these theorems are actually known to be equivalent, so that the assertion that "PIT" holds is usually taken as the assertion that the corresponding statement for Boolean algebras (BPI) is valid.
_	In two dimensions, this is the assertion that the length of the leg of a right triangle may not exceed the length of the hypotenuse.
_	Such critics urge practitioners to embrace the assertion that "[Ueshiba's] transcendence to the spiritual and universal reality were the fundamentals of the paradigm that he demonstrated."
_	In this book she made the assertion that her reported testimony before the Warren Commission was fabricated by the commission, a claim also made by others about Warren Commission testimony.
_	Here former Prime Minister Kåre Willoch among others defended the surveillance of the Workers' Communist Party with the assertion that this was an illegal organization, a view which was gainsayed by experts.
_	Whether this was out of necessity or merely a choice by Cato remains unclear, however, since the assertion that he might very well have already known Greek at the time can be made from anecdotal evidence.
_	Particularly in dispute is the assertion that Khosrau II received a letter from Muhammad, as the Sassanid court ceremony was notoriously intricate, and it is unlikely that a letter from what at the time was a minor regional power would have reached the hands of the Shahanshah.
_	After the Magellan-Elcano expedition (1519–1522), Charles V sent a second expedition, led by García Jofre de Loaísa, to colonise the islands, based on the assertion that they were in the Castilian zone, under the Treaty of Tordesillas.
_	Alleles linked so far strongly support the assertion that there is a large number of genotypes that are
_	Other scholars point out that such a travelling folktale might become, in its various forms, more or less coherent; the assertion that one version is more coherent than the other does not compel the conclusion that the first is more original.
_	Sandhyavandanam in many traditions includes the assertion that Shiva and Vishnu are one and the same:
_	There is evidence to support the assertion that the appointment of teachers to classes is disproportionate.
_	Another benefit cited for WAP Billing is the assertion that users experience the same ‘browse and buy’ experience they are used to via their PC on the Internet.
_	Duality, as such, is the assertion that truth is invariant under this operation on statements.
_	However, Rafael Medoff of the David S. Wyman Institute for Holocaust Studies denied the assertion that "The historian and author, Raoul Hilberg, thinks that the figure does not exceed 890,000", and said this is "utterly false".
_	This is based on the assertion that the rapid application of ECPR can temporarily support patients with cardiovascular collapse, whilst permitting an assessment of potential options to maximise long-term survival.
_	Some see the fact that prices are low as lending evidence to the assertion that a monopoly is a non-coercive monopoly.
_	Therefore, Ingham et al. (1974) support the assertion that motivational losses largely determine an individual’s decline in performance when acting as a member of a group.
_	In his later work "The Tacit Dimension" he made the assertion that "we can know more than we can tell."
_	Apart from the assertion that the name is derived from that of Bilé, and that it is Hebrew for "miracle" (פֶּ֫לֶא), the word has no known meaning in Portuguese.
_	Solutions based on the assertion that the host's actions cannot affect the probability that the car is behind the initially chosen appear persuasive, but the assertion is simply untrue unless each of the host's two choices are equally likely, if he has a choice (Falk 1992:207,213).
_	In between these views is the assertion that comments are neither beneficial nor harmful by themselves, and what matters is that they are correct and kept in sync with the source code, and omitted if they are superfluous, excessive, difficult to maintain or otherwise unhelpful.
_	where the max is taken over all "a" coprime to "q", then the Elliott–Halberstam conjecture is the assertion that
_	Second, the 2000 revision of the BF&M removed the assertion that the person of Jesus Christ was to be the exegetical standard by which the Bible was to be interpreted, and replaced it with the last sentence in the quotation below.
_	"Disorder" prompted the assertion that "Burbridge always was a caustic writer", but in his individualistic approach, "in fact he was pointing out the very obvious flaws in our so-called civilised society."
_	One unproven aspect of the reported Dogon knowledge of the Sirius system is the assertion that the Dogon knew of another star in the Sirius system, Emme Ya, or "larger than Sirius B but lighter and dim in magnitude."
_	Also, regarding the assertion that 40% of women in Riga are prostitutes, Hollender defended himself by stating that he used "Latvian sources".
_	The existence of the 1924-1941 gap, plus the need to combine several different broadcasting operations, makes the assertion that WRUC (FM) is a direct continuation of 2ADD problematical.
_	The local historian Stuart Harris, writing in the 1990s, dismissed the assertion that these mounds were siegeworks rather than natural hillocks, stating that the belief was a "spurious 'tradition'".
_	There is much evidence that lends basis to the assumption that the Diar Rabia itself was the cradle of their nascency, later spreading to other parts of the Caliphate territories The Kurds' acceptance of the assertion that they derive from Arab origin should come as no surprise, in light of the consideration that the claim would have ensured Kurdish princes converting to Islam reverence and prestige in some circles and accordingly, the extension of their sphere of influence.
_	Behe gives the following reply to the assertion that intelligent design is "unfalsifiable" or that he is attempting to avoid the possibility of testing the positive claims of intelligent design:
_	Later, Sherman responded by challenging the assertion that matters were purer in the East and with a pragmatic defense of professionalism as "an evil, but not an unmixed evil," and "a bad means to a good end."
_	The song's author, John Linnell, denied the assertion that there is a deeper meaning to "Particle Man", stating on a phone interview filmed for "Gigantic (A Tale of Two Johns)", that "nothing is missing from your understanding of 'Particle Man'".
_	Based on this case study the assertion that "those with hysteria suffer for the most part from their reminiscences", in other words from traumatic memories which can be "processed" by relating them, was formulated for the first time.
_	The Bush administration based its rationale for war principally on the assertion that Iraq possessed weapons of mass destruction (WMDs) and that Saddam's government posed an immediate threat to the United States and its coalition allies.
_	He also rejected outright the assertion that the transformation in question had "proceeded from, or [had been] excited into action by another [person]" ("Neurypnology", p.32).
_	Jed delivers a deposition in which he launches into a monologue about his own infallibility as a surgeon, concluding with the assertion that he is literally God.
_	The United States and Canada impose a lower tax rate on dividend income than ordinary income, on the assertion that company profits had already been taxed as corporate tax.
_	Legend has it that he was betrayed by a woman of the town but there is no contemporary documentary evidence for this claim; nor is there contemporary evidence for the assertion that Ferrers was hiding under sacks of wool stored in the church.
_	While some critics, such as writer Christopher Hitchens, psychologist Steven Pinker and Nobel laureates Sir Harold Kroto, James D. Watson, and Steven Weinberg have defended Dawkins's stance on religion and praised his work, others, including Nobel Prize-winning theoretical physicist Peter Higgs, astrophysicist Martin Rees, philosopher of science Michael Ruse, literary critic Terry Eagleton, and theologian Alister McGrath, have criticised Dawkins on various grounds, including the assertion that his work simply serves as an atheist counterpart to religious fundamentalism rather than a productive critique of it, and that he has fundamentally misapprehended the foundations of the theological positions he claims to refute.
_	Claims that Engelram was the count of Flanders are clearly false (as is the assertion that he was the grandfather of Baldwin I).
_	Society has been identified (along with the North American Man/Boy Love Association) as an organization "challenging the assertion that sexual abuse is bad because of its effects on children."
_	Controversy surrounds the assertion that a massacre by Israelis took place at Tantura.
_	Response times were faster when old faces (salient) were paired with non-words (salient) than when old faces (salient) were paired with neutral words (non-salient), supporting the assertion that faster response time can be facilitated by matching salience.
_	"Washington Post" writer Mary C. Morton described Jynx as having "explicitly, albeit grossly caricatured, womanly features", and challenged the assertion that the games crossed gender barriers with such.
_	In May 2010, a poll conducted in the UK by YouGov revealed that 66% of those surveyed held a favourable view of the US and 62% agreed with the assertion that America is Britain's most important ally.
_	In 2013, Pope Francis became the first Catholic leader to call for "sincere and rigorous" interbelief dialogue with atheists, both to counter the assertion that Christianity is necessarily an "expression of darkness of superstition that is opposed to the light of reason," and to assert that "dialogue is not a secondary accessory of the existence of the believer" but instead is a "profound and indispensable expression ... [of] faith [that] is not intransigent, but grows in coexistence that respects the other."
_	Keller also disagrees with the assertion that the leaders of the coup were the only organized group critical of the monarchy and its policies, pointing to nationalist organizations coalescing amongst the Oromo, Somali, Eritreans, and Tigreans, noting that "these pockets of opposition might never have emerged if the emperor's policies had been more sensitively directed at building legitimacy among the masses rather than simply at securing compliance or acquiescence to laws and policies."
_	However, major optometric organizations, including the [[American Optometric Association]], the [[American Academy of Optometry]], the [[College of Optometrists in Vision Development]], and the [[Optometric Extension Program]], support the assertion that non-strabismic visual therapy does address underlying visual problems which are claimed to affect learning potential.
_	David Walker's "Appeal" (1829) places this biblical story of liberation in tension with the assertion that the Pharaohs were black as well.
_	Foxfire continues to train educators in its constructivist methods, which begins with the assertion that students must construct meaning for themselves, rather than memorizing information a teacher deems important.
_	They also take issue with the assertion that fluid mechanics is unfairly neglected because it deals with "feminine" fluids in contrast to "masculine" rigid mechanics.
_	Coombs supported the assertion that specimen AMNH 5266 represented a juvenile by citing that the vertebral centra were not fused to their neural arches, and that sacral ribs were likewise not fused to vertebrae and to the ilium.
_	For instance, chapter 11 of Manusmriti starts with the assertion that it will now discuss penance (prāyaścittas), but the 43 verses that follow have nothing to do with penance, and Olivelle suggests this is evidence of later interpolated replacement.
_	Kane appeals to Wilson to out-vote Brent, based on the assertion that after being held captive, rank no longer matters.
_	The forty-ninth item on the list was the assertion that God is incapable of moving the universe because it implies the existence of a void.
_	Hookem later denied the assertion that he had punched Woolfe.
_	SAML specifies the content of the assertion that is passed from the IdP to the SP.
_	Bhaskara already dealt with the assertion that if "p" is a prime number, then 1 + ("p"–1)!
_	In the 1900 essay, "On Anarchy", he wrote; "The Anarchists are right in everything; in the negation of the existing order, and in the assertion that, without Authority, there could not be worse violence than that of Authority under existing conditions.
_	Kahn recruited Jenna with the assertion that Charlotte left enough money in her will to afford Marshall another eye surgery.
_	On the other hand, the assertion that he was a "Goth" is based on a single Syriac source, and is today considered dubious.
_	The case went to the State Supreme Court and The Harkness Estate was successful in defending the assertion that he was not a resident of New York upon his death.
_	Father Pedro Arrupe made the assertion that all students must become people of the world who help people to truly reach the fundamental goal of academic Jesuit teachings.
_	In the dream-like realm of End-World, Marten Broadcloak taunts Roland with the assertion that it is he whose machinations led to Roland's situation, and will lead to his eventual death.
_	Subsequently, he has explicitly rejected the assertion that he was motivated by blasphemy, saying instead that it was intended as a serious work of Christian art.
_	It is simply untruthful... to continue the assertion that trade unions are mainly controlled and strikes originated by agitators, interested only for what they make out of them".
_	The polemnicist Caroline Fourest introduced an opinion piece on the matter with the assertion that Geisser was "known for his controversial position in support of radical Islam" (""... connu pour ses prises de position polémiques en faveur de l'islam radical"").
_	The men have a pending civil suit, "Wilkerson, Wallace and Woodfox vs. the State of Louisiana", which the United States Supreme Court ruled has merit to proceed to trial based on the assertion that their more than three decades of solitary confinement is "inhumane and unconstitutional".
_	Quantum indeterminacy is the assertion that the state of a system does not determine a unique collection of values for all its measurable properties.
_	Also at issue was the assertion that capital punishment discriminated against the poor and underprivileged—Spenkelink often signed his prison correspondence with the epigram, "capital punishment means those without capital get the punishment."
_	Friedman wraps up the documentary by making the assertion that "9/11 just might change the Arab and Muslim world even more than the United States.
_	"Jurassic World" (2015) contradicts the assertion that Jurassic Park was demolished and the dinosaurs destroyed, due to the "T. rex" being the original from "Jurassic Park" (1993).
_	The amicus brief by the American Civil Rights Coalition takes on the assertion that a ban on non-resident circulators is effective at limiting fraud in the initiative process.
_	Bisexual erasure also includes the assertion that all bisexual individuals are in a phase and will soon choose a side, either heterosexual or homosexual.
_	The newer line was hailed by one newspaper with the assertion that "It will allow capital that has been lying idle to become revenue producing, it will provide facilities for the transfer of rolling stock, it will provide quicker touch with markets and reduce transport costs, and it will insure the graziers and the State against the probable loss of millions of sheep in drought time."
_	APA Division 36 (then "Psychologists Interested in Religious Issues" (PIRI), subsequently "Psychology of Religion") in its 1990 annual convention approved a resolution stating that insufficient consensually accepted research then scientifically supported the assertion that equated the use of "techniques of influence as typically practiced" by religious groups with "coercive persuasion", "mind control", or "brainwashing".
_	This doctrine, apparently patterned after Christ's Incarnation (God is made flesh in the Person of Jesus Christ), is the assertion that "God is made bread" in the Eucharist.
_	She remarked to a journalist, "I've cast myself as Scarlett O'Hara", and "The Observer" film critic C. A. Lejeune recalled a conversation of the same period in which Leigh "stunned us all" with the assertion that Olivier "won't play Rhett Butler, but I shall play Scarlett O'Hara.
_	However, his selection was criticised due to his history of expressing far-right political views in his actions and lyrics, including a speech made at a protest in 2014 supporting the assertion that the German Reich continues to exist within its pre-World War II borders, his propagation of conspiracy theories surrounding the September 11 attacks and the 2008 financial crisis, and a song in which he referred to Baron Rothschild as "Baron Deadschild" and a "schmuck", as well as a collaboration with Kool Savas titled "Wo sind sie jetzt?", which contained homophobic lyrics which were interpreted as associating homosexuality with paedophilia.
_	One prominent trend in this literature is the assertion that those with social/dating anxiety disorders are more likely to use online media to initiate relationships than those without those disorders.
_	The progress of the Olympic Torch rapidly gave the lie to the idea that people would not show an interest in the event, or indeed the assertion that certain sections of society might stay away.
_	Another guest, noted criminologist Captain Bedford (played by Fred Esmelton), makes the assertion that a very valuable string of pearls cannot be stolen.
_	Another criticism comes from the assertion that neither cardinal nor ordinal utility is empirically observable in the real world.
_	The charter contains references to anti-Semitic canards, such as the assertion that through shrewd manipulation of imperial countries and secret societies, Jews were behind a wide range of events and disasters going as far back in history as the French Revolution.
_	DeChristopher responded in court to the assertion that he could have filed written protests against certain parcels:
_	Pliny's Natural History adduces Philostephanus as a source for the assertion that Jason was the first that went out to sea in a long vessel.
_	It comprises nine parts which follow the course of the Battle of Trafalgar from the point of view of a British sailor, starting with the call to arms, progressing through the death of a comrade, thoughts of home, and ending with a victorious return and the assertion that Britain will continue to 'rule the waves':
_	Recently, controversy has arisen with the assertion that Borchardt smuggled the bust of Nefertiti out of Egypt by reporting it as an artifact made of gypsum.
_	In a "Time Out" review, the film was rated positively, with the assertion that it is a "mammoth audience teaser [...]
_	This was clarified in a letter to the Director of the NASA Ames Research Center, for the "Kepler" Science Council dated August 2, 2010 states, "Analysis of the current "Kepler" data does not support the assertion that "Kepler" has found any Earth-like planets."
_	Film scholar Linda Williams also writes that the assertion that "A Free Ride" is the earliest surviving American stag film is "doubtful".
_	Reports of subsequent years also identified discrimination against Arab citizens as a problem area for Israel, but did not repeat the assertion that Israel had done little to reduce discrimination.
_	and Cedric Tille agree with the assertion that U.S. foreign assets are currently undervalued.
_	There are more examples in the Talmud to justify the assertion that Hoshaiah as the representative of Judaism was in constant touch with the early Christians at Cæsarea, and particularly with Origen, who was ordained presbyter at Cæsarea in 228, and who in 231 opened a philosophical and theological school which was attended by persons from all parts, anxious to hear his interpretation of the Christian Scriptures.
_	"We must start with the assertion that all knowledge which purports to be valid in anything like the scientific sense presumes both the reality of object known and of a knower.
_	A more contentious argument lay in the assertion that Indians have already made better and more realistic films about poverty and corruption in India.
_	However the editors of Hayton & Mitchell say this case might nonetheless have been rightly decided, "depending on whether the ultra vires depositors' claim to recover their money on the ground of failure of consideration was founded on the assertion that the building society had failed to repay their money, or on the assertion that their contracts with the building society had been void from the beginning."
_	A language-user's following a rule correctly is not justified by any fact that obtains about the relationship between his candidate application of a rule in a particular case, and the putative rule itself (as for Hume the causal link between two events "a" and "b" is not determined by any particular fact obtaining between them "taken in isolation"), but rather the assertion that the rule that is being followed is justified by the fact that the behaviors surrounding the candidate instance of rule-following (by the candidate rule-follower) meet the expectations of other language users.
_	When in his later years his attention was drawn to a balanced assessment of his work by Martin Seymour-Smith in that poet and critic's immense "Guide to Modern World Literature" (Macmillan), he was gratified both by the tone of the commentary and by the assertion that he was still widely read.
_	A more recent variant that emerged in the 1980s is "originalism", the assertion that the United States Constitution should be interpreted to the maximum extent possible in the light of what it meant when it was adopted.
_	In 2000, the accident reports were declassified and released, and it was found that the assertion that they contained secret information was fraudulent.
_	The book gave a colourful account of the author's adventures as a soldier of fortune in the Netherlands; it attacked the Spanish and the Catholic clergy, addressing English Catholics with the assertion that "They make you and other Catholics believe that what practices and drifts so ever they take in hand, are all for the zeale of religion...and you silly foules think all they saie to bee
_	In the court's view, only speculation supporting the assertion that human activity associated with the school would harass the owl.
_	After the revolution, the assertion that the Bahá'ís were agents of the Shah perhaps partly originates because Bahá'ís did not help the revolutionary groups, since one of the tenets of the Bahá'í Faith is to obey the government of one's country.
_	Russia has seen some discussion regarding its potential of re-emerging as a superpower, while others have made the assertion that it is already a superpower.
_	The subtext is the assertion that disabled people are almost always the object of scrutiny and curiosity."
_	Colonel Icebot calls her one of the deadliest warriors in Grimlord's army, responding to General Ivar's claims about Metalbot with the assertion that "his" Cobrot's engines would whip the Troopers into butter.
_	Lewis puts forth the assertion that the religion is growing at a "healthy—but not a spectacular—rate" (22 percent over the period from 1990 to 2001, from 45,000 to 55,000 according to an American survey of religious self-identification), and states that contrary to the Church's own claims, it is "clearly not the world's fastest growing".
_	By a third paragraph of his performances was the assertion that Buddhism is a religion of optimism and activity, but in any case not of pessimism and inactivity.
_	The protesters contend, and the movie supports, the assertion that the protests were responsible for delaying the licensing of the Diablo Canyon Power Plant and, as a result of the delay, the uncovering of serious construction errors was made public just before the plant went online and started producing power.
_	Inman, however, disputed the assertion that he had instigated an attack, noting in a blog post that Carreon's contact information had been redacted from his initial comic and that he had never directed anyone to attack Carreon.
_	A topological space "X" is path-connected if and only if its 0-th homotopy group vanishes identically, as path-connectedness implies that any two points "x" and "x" in "X" can be connected with a continuous path which starts in "x" and ends in "x", which is equivalent to the assertion that every mapping from "S" (a discrete set of two points) to "X" can be deformed continuously to a constant map.
_	The Nazi Senate President Hermann Rauschning endorsed this step with the assertion that in various criminal trials against leading officers of the Communist Party in Danzig, the illegal holding of guns had been established.
_	However, later authors disputed the assertion that "T. lorentzi" is more primitive and simply consider "Prototoxotes" a synonym of "Toxotes", where "T. lorentzi" is usually placed.
_	The main theoretical argument against the quantum mind hypothesis is the assertion that quantum states in the brain would lose coherency before they reached a scale where they could be useful for neural processing.
_	An interesting experiment used by Cross was to use paper with slightly curved lines for note-taking, on the assertion that as the hand could move more naturally in an arc across the page than in a straight line; this would improve speed.
_	As in the 1930s, Qasim based Iraq's claim on the assertion that Kuwait had been a district of the Ottoman province of Basra, unjustly severed by the British from the main body of Iraqi state when it had been created in the 1920s.
_	Paul Deussen "et al." consider this Upanishad on the garbha or human embryo to be more like "a manual on physiology or medicine" than a spiritual text, with the exception of a passage which includes a number of statements about the foetus awareness, including the assertion that the foetus has knowledge of its past lives as well as intuitive sense of good and bad, which it forgets during the process of birth.
_	The authors of the 2010 book "Merchants of Doubt", provide documentation for the assertion that professional deniers have tried to sow seeds of doubt in public opinion in order to halt any meaningful social or political progress to reduce the impact of human carbon emissions.
_	Some criticisms are based on the assertion that the Marxian conception of society is fundamentally flawed.
_	This aspiration was supported by the assertion that, to make a proper translation, agricultural experience was a prerequisite – and for the lack of which, in the view of William Benson, Dryden’s version was disqualified.
_	The Encyclopædia Britannica writes that "by the time of Eliot's death in 1965 ... a convincing case could be made for the assertion that Auden was indeed Eliot's successor, as Eliot had inherited sole claim to supremacy when Yeats died in 1939."
_	Even the leading advocates of animal rights seem to have shrunk from basing their claim on the only argument which can ultimately be held to be a really sufficient one—the assertion that animals, as well as men, though, of course, to a far less extent than men, are possessed of a distinctive individuality, and, therefore, are in justice entitled to live their lives with a due measure of that "restricted freedom" to which Herbert Spencer alludes.
_	The Phoenix Company responded with the assertion that it was protected from the labour conditions of the lease under the Companies Act, because it was in liquidation.
_	During 2007, LYM members have been seen in on the streets, campuses and conferences emphasizing two issues in particular: a call by LaRouche for the impeachment of Dick Cheney, and the assertion that the theory of human-caused global warming is a fraud motivated by Malthusianism.
_	Surveys also showed that both mycotoxin-producing fungi and mycotoxin contamination were common in Southeast Asia, casting doubt on the assertion that detecting these compounds was an unusual occurrence.
_	This likely backs the assertion that there are several groups involved in the violence, few of whom have been placated by the government's change of strategy.
_	Among the many things found on the plaque was the assertion that 2,000 people were killed by Gen. Dyer's troops.
_	During this period, his company became "Società Italiana Caproni", a major conglomerate which purchased other manufacturers, creating subsidiaries which included Caproni Bergamasca and Caproni Vizzola, although the assertion that Caproni also purchased the Reggiane company to form a "Caproni Reggiane" subsidiary is a myth.
_	Upon reading Huie’s book, Hagin disagreed with the assertion that McCollum had been in a consensual, sexual relationship with Adams and that the Adams shooting was over a money dispute.
_	The Nazareth District Court rejected the testimony of the defense expert about the kind of knife used in the murder, and called the assertion that it was not possible to identify the bloody shoe print "embarrassing and fundamentally flawed."
_	This was justified by the assertion that pointing reduces to an information processing task.
_	Moreover, some of the claims made by the early intelligence, such as the assertion that Jumale and Bin Ladin were in Afghanistan together, proved to be wrong.
_	Together with the existence property it translates to the assertion that formula_14 is an indecomposable projective object – the functor it represents (the global-section functor) preserves epimorphisms and coproducts.
_	In the European Values Study (EVS) of 2008 the percentage of Austrian respondents who agreed with the assertion that "Marriage is an outdated institution" was 30.5%, and as of 2012, 41.5% of children were born outside of marriage.
_	A number of books and articles have repeated the assertion that a rock was deliberately thrown at Ghanem.
_	It "manifested itself in various ways" – for instance, in the belief that the government used the control of language and grammar to brainwash people, the notion that the government was creating "infinite currency" without the backing of gold and silver, or the assertion that NASA was faking spaceflights.
_	The case of Athens is analyzed with many examples of what would be acceptable and what would not, and at the end he makes the assertion that Athens' code of behaviour favors the nobler type of love and discourages the baser.
_	Roberts rejects the assertion that he is an anti-Semite, noting that two of the founders of the "Galileo Movement" were Jewish, and stated that "I respect and admire the Jews".
_	One source, a 2007 book about the Rocky Mountain Rescue Group, contradicts the assertion that military jets bombed the site with napalm; instead, the book states that the cliff face was mined with explosives that were detonated in the spring of 1956, and the event was tightly controlled and not publicized.
_	Brickman himself acknowledges that he is a controversial figure among legal scholars by choice, concluding an unapologetically argumentative 2005 essay in the "Pepperdine Law Review" with the assertion that: "This view underpins my scholarship: that identifying what is actually occurring in our legal system is, or at least ought to be, a prime purpose of scholarship; that by identifying these truths and bringing them to the attention of both the academy and the profession, I am providing an opportunity to curb abuses in the legal system; and that focusing on these abuses will ultimately be in the self-interest of the legal profession."
_	In a 2013 Romanian survey, 30.9% of respondents agreed with the assertion that "women are sometimes beaten due to their own fault".
_	The Philippine claim to Kalayaan on a geographical basis can be summarised using the assertion that Kalayaan is distinct from other island groups in the South China Sea, because of the size of the biggest island in the Kalayaan group.
_	The argument is essentially founded in the assertion that the painting does not depict an actual place, and thus cannot be accurately located.
_	The Court rejected the assertion that the case was in one of two exceptions to the mootness doctrine that were raised by the plaintiff.
_	Fishman also rejected the assertion that the students' tactics were improper.<br>
_	Angela dismissed the assertion that her father had returned to the mainland voluntarily.
_	It is straightforward to show that the assertion that each natural number is Cantorian is equivalent to the assertion that the set of all natural numbers is strongly Cantorian.
_	He could recall several greetings and some numbers, all of which corresponded to Sheni, supporting the assertion that Sheni and Ziriya were the same language.
_	Intrapsychic Humanism is based on the assertion that every individual comes into the world innately programmed for relationship experience and that everything that happens to them has the meaning of ideal love.
_	He made the assertion that it led to the fall of Ancient Greece, referring to the promotion of same-sex relations in Ancient Greece.
_	Another major error in the text is the assertion that Assyria fought "twelve kings".
_	It is very likely that the dating of heretics according to papal reigns in Irenaeus and Epiphanius—e.g., that Marcion's disciple Cerdon and Valentinus came to Rome under Anicetus—was derived from Hegesippus, and the same may be true of the assertion that Hermas, author of The Shepherd of Hermas, was the brother of Pope Pius I (as the Liberian Catalogue, the poem against Marcion, and the Muratorian fragment all state).
_	Cruz responded to Trump on January 12 with the assertion that he and Hillary Clinton knew each other well and that "it's interesting that Hillary Clinton's key supporters are doing everything they can to echo Donald's attacks on me."
_	The Senlis proposal is based in part on the assertion that there is an acute global shortage of opium poppy–based medicines some of which (morphine) are on the World Health Organisation's list of essential drugs as they are the most effective way of relieving severe pain.
_	The identity is equivalent to the assertion that the function
_	Other information that he related included the assertion that there were no horses in Britain, that Hadrian's Wall separated the temperate parts of the island from the uninhabitable parts, and that 'countless people' had attested that Britain was the home of dead souls.
_	The new law officer defended his conduct with the assertion that his alliance in politics had been with George Grenville, and that the connection had been severed on his death.
_	The campaign to conflate contraception and abortion is rooted on the assertion that contraception ends, rather than prevents, pregnancy.
_	De León countered with the assertion that the tragic deaths of migrants should cease to be hidden.
_	In the 1980s Guy Robin showed that the Riemann hypothesis is equivalent to the assertion that the following inequality is true for all "n" > 5040: (where γ is the Euler–Mascheroni constant)
_	This particular Russian viewpoint is called the "Myth of 1939–40" by David Mendeloff, Associate Professor of International Affairs who states that the assertion that Soviet Union neither "occupied" the Baltic states in 1939 nor "annexed" them the following year is widely held and deeply embedded in Russian historical consciousness.
_	Temple Denial refers to the assertion that none of the Temples in Jerusalem ever existed or were not located on the Temple Mount.
_	For instance, in the European Values Study (EVS) of 2008, the percentage of respondents who agreed with the assertion that "Marriage is an outdated institution" was 37.5% in Luxembourg, 35.4% in France, 34.3% in Belgium, 31.2% in Spain, 30.5% in Austria, 29.2% in Germany, 27.7% in Switzerland, 27.2% in Bulgaria, 27.0% in the Netherlands, 25.0% in Slovenia.
_	Creel says the Chinese evidently came to use "Rongdi" and "Manyi" "as generalized terms denoting 'non-Chinese,' 'foreigners,' 'barbarians'," and a statement such as "the Rong and Di are wolves" ("Zuozhuan", Min 1) is "very much like the assertion that many people in many lands will make today, that 'no foreigner can be trusted'."
_	There have been several arguments supporting and opposing the assertion that blocking ads is wrong.
_	Aside from the assertion that the stepmother had previously attempted to poison her husband, the speaker provides no evidence of his claims.
_	Let "P"("n") be the assertion that "n" is not in "S". Then "P"(0) is true, for if it were false then 0 is the least element of "S".
_	Margaret had on one occasion insulted a mother of twins with the assertion that these children would have to have two different fathers.
_	The "Alice" case and its progeny also cast doubt on the assertion that use of the "programmed computer claim format" overcomes the patent-eligibility problem.
_	This follows from the assertion that metapragmatic speech characterizes speech function, and denotation or reference are among the many functions of speech.
_	He let it be known that he supported the assertion that government agents deliberately set the complex on fire.
_	Regarding Jones' theory that nanothermite was used to bring down the towers, and the assertion that thermite and nanothermite composites were found in the dust and debris were found following the collapse of the three buildings, which was concluded to be proof that explosives brought down the buildings, Brent Blanchard, author of "A History of Explosive Demolition in America", states that questions about the viability of Jones' theories remain unanswered, such as the fact that no demolition personnel noticed any telltale signs of thermite during the eight months of debris removal following the towers' collapse.
_	Two of Taylor's employees worked at the Bethlehem Steel plant, experimenting with loading strategies and searching out exemplary workers to serve as models for the assertion that "a good day's wages could be made at the existing rates by a good man" (original research reported quoted by Wrege & Perroni, 1974, p. 17).
_	Of particular importance to Pope was the assertion that if Porter had moved at 1:00 am as ordered, Longstreet would have been unable to take up the close position on Jackson's right flank and then the Confederates behind the unfinished railroad grade might have been dislodged.
_	In Shannon's revolutionary and groundbreaking paper, the work for which had been substantially completed at Bell Labs by the end of 1944, Shannon for the first time introduced the qualitative and quantitative model of communication as a statistical process underlying information theory, opening with the assertion that
_	Kollath appealed against his dismissal with the assertion that he was not an active fascist, but had represented contrary opinions.
_	The formation of the U.G.M.R.C and the assertion that Imam Mukhtari Abass was the National Chief Imam was challenged by the Ghana Muslim Representative Council (G.M.R.C), who took U.G.M.R.C and Imam Mukhtari Abass to court.
_	Her only public explanation was the assertion that: “You can’t run for leader at the same time as being deputy leader”.
_	A potential contradiction in Thomas's majority opinion may not help on that front that pecerption; specifically, the assertion that surface designs are "inherently separable" from useful articles without being useful articles themselves and the assertion that other clothing bearing the design do not conjure the original useful article.
_	Steve Lukather has disputed the assertion that cocaine use contributed to Porcaro's death, claiming that while he occasionally consumed the drug, he was not a heavy user or addict.
_	The various notions of convergence formalize the assertion that the 'average value' of each 'sufficiently nice' function should converge:
_	Denial of the Holodomor (, ) is the assertion that the 1932–1933 Holodomor, a man-made famine in Soviet Ukraine, did not occur or diminishing the scale and significance of the famine.
_	Tilak dates the Vedic antiquity using the assertion that the Milky Way (path of the dead) used to be guarded by Sharvara and a new year started upon the crossing of Milky Way by the sun.
_	Yanovski et al. investigated the assertion that the average American gains weight over the season.
_	In the few instances in which courts have been confronted with the assertion that it was, those claims have been dismissed.
_	Solovay has shown the precise equivalence in consistency strength of NFUB = NFU + "Infinity" + "Cantorian Sets" + "Small Ordinals" with Morse–Kelley set theory plus the assertion that the proper class ordinal (the class of all ordinals) is a weakly compact cardinal.
_	Three other lines of evidence likewise lend support to the assertion that Mendel’s results are indeed too good to be true.
_	Their Honours rejected the assertion that there was a preference for American decisions, or any disregard for British decisions, instead holding that the distinction was based on the deliberate adoption by the framers of the Australian Constitution of the language of the United States Constitution and a rejection of the scheme of the Canadian Constitution.
_	Chapter 5 of his book is frequently cited to support the assertion that the Faith Campaign of Saddam Hussein promoted Salafi ideology, and thus created a base for the rise in 2003 of the Islamic State of Iraq and the related insurgency.
_	Allah the Father also rejected the assertion that Nation's biracial founder, Wallace Fard Muhammad, was Allah and instead taught that the black man was himself God personified.
_	Peppler repeated the assertion that none of the captive's assertions of abuse were credible because al Qaeda trained operatives to lie about abuse.
_	In 2012, a fresh molecular study revived the assertion that the Stepsiptera are the sister group of the Coleoptera (beetles).
_	It later retracted the assertion that he had been shot in the back.
_	In a 1993 interview on the NBC program "Unsolved Mysteries", he proffered the assertion that Long was accidentally shot by one of his own bodyguards.
_	Michael Kimmel, a professor of sociology at Stony Brook University, makes the assertion that men and women are not fundamentally different, contrary to what Gray suggests in his book.
_	He also rejected outright the assertion that the transformation in question had "proceeded from, or [had been] excited into action by another [person]" ("Neurypnology", p. 32).
_	During the investigation, a number of accusations were made against the visionaries, including the assertion that the apparition was actually just a middle-aged woman named La Merlière.
_	One of the most daunting tasks involved in studying parasitic relationships from the past is supporting the assertion that the relationship between two organisms is indeed parasitic.
_	A fake memoir is a book that was published with the assertion that the events depicted are substantially true, but are later discovered or strongly asserted to be false.
_	The focus is mostly on females to appreciate their different and unique skin tones, with the assertion that beauty comes in all different shades
_	They help ensure the reliability of data generated by IT systems and support the assertion that systems operate as intended and that output is reliable.
_	Australia's then Air Minister, Arthur Drakeford, objected to the findings of the inquiry, stating that the lack of definitive evidence in the report rendered its findings "inconclusive," and that the assertion that the Kempsey range station malfunctioned was "difficult to believe."
_	The letter included the assertion that Soloveitchik believed Schneerson to have been worthy of being Messiah, that the Chabad position that Schneerson was the Messiah could not be dismissed as heretical, and cited a number of sources to demonstrate that he could be the Messiah.
_	The technique relies on the assertion that the subject will subconsciously reveal their thoughts through very slight involuntary physical reactions, also known as ideomotor responses.
_	Local historian René Descadeillas commented: "They found no evidence anywhere to support the assertion that, down the ages, any individual, family, group or clan could have accumulated a precious treasure-hoard at Rennes and then concealed it in the locality or its environs.
_	According to PolitiFact, the assertion that Trump was implementing the same policy as Obama is "false", noting "Obama's immigration policy specifically sought to avoid breaking up families.
_	Written in the margins next to Radulf's obituary is the assertion that he was the 4th Abbot of Kinloss, and if these are accurate, Radulf II would have succeeded not long after Radulf I's departure to Melrose Abbey in 1194.
_	So Arthur Berriedale Keith 1925 mentioned that "the assertion that the Rbhus are really the Rthus" (the seasons) "is not 'in the slightest degree plausible'".
_	Freud, however, contested this criticism, noting that "the assertion that all dreams require a sexual interpretation, against which critics rage so incessantly, occurs nowhere in my "Interpretation of Dreams."
_	But the assertion that Nosov in his book allegedly defends "good capitalism", denying communism, is wrong.
_	He also did a thorough investigation of facts surrounding emperor Langdarma, where he challenged the assertion that Langdarma was a persecutor of Buddhism and a supporter of Bon.
_	She states that this concept has been accelerated by "the assertion that all women are oppressed."
_	Kahn recruited Jenna with the assertion that Charlotte left enough money in her will to afford Marshall another eye surgery.
_	Statistics compiled by Lam's office corroborate the assertion that total prosecutions in border crossing cases have declined over Lam's tenure.
_	The argument that publicly funded research should be made openly available has been countered with the assertion that "taxes are generally not paid so that taxpayers can access research results, but rather so that society can benefit from the results of that research; in the form of new medical treatments, for example.
_	However, the assertion that the technology showed 17 pyramids was denounced as "completely wrong" by the Minister of State for Antiquities at the time, Zahi Hawass.
_	Tensions with North Korea have heightened as the result of reports that it is stockpiling nuclear weapons and the assertion that it is willing to sell its nuclear weapons and ballistic missile technology to any group willing to pay a high enough price.
_	Relying on the assertion that "Mary is full of grace", he argued that in order to find grace with God, one must first discover Mary.
_	Another aspect of economic antisemitism is the assertion that Jews do not produce anything of value but instead tend to serve as middlemen, acting as "parasites in the production line" of non-Jews, who are doing the real work.
_	These findings support the assertion that generating spontaneous speech is highly demanding on cognitive resources and suggest that real world dual-task effects on gait may be underestimated by reaction time tasks.
_	Stock prices eventually collapsed, starting their decline in March 2000, though the S&P500 remained above its 1996 level, casting doubt on the assertion that there was a stock market bubble in 1996.
_	In 1898, Hale made the assertion that Vallandigham stated "he did not want to belong to the United States".
_	Rwandan genocide denial is the assertion that the Rwandan genocide did not occur in the manner or to the extent described by scholarship.
_	Sinclair & Renouf (1988:155) find that (as with other synthetic syllabi), claims made for the lexical syllabus are not supported by evidence, and the assertion that the lexical syllabus is "an independent syllabus, unrelated by any principles to any methodology" (Sinclair et al. 1988:155) is subject to the criticism levelled by Brumfit against notional functional syllabi, i.e. that it (in this case, deliberately) takes no cognisance of how a second language is learned.
_	In the series, this story conflicts with the assertion that her death occurred "six years ago".
_	Stricter individualist anarchists generally deny the assertion that private corporations, for instance, are fundamentally different from trade unions or political parties or religious institutions or even non-governmental organizations.
_	In fact, it opens with the assertion that Only when Shiva is united with Shakti does he have the power to create.
_	The traditional interpretation and title of his "Prodigal Son" in Munich has been challenged, with the assertion that it merely shows a "festive" tavern scene, despite the presence of an older woman and feathers in the girls' hair, often taken as diagnostic of a brothel scene.
_	The facsimile was accompanied by an open letter containing similar accusatory claims made by Dan Mureșan, who recommended himself as the political consultant of a company working for the United States Republican Party, and relying on the assertion that Tismăneanu had settled in the United States only after 1985.
_	The Letter’s rationale behind this departure from standard criminal procedure is the assertion that unlawful sexual harassment may occur that is not a violation of the criminal law and mandated that schools, if appeals are provided, must allow both parties to appeal.
_	Here, the existence of the adjoint "N*" requires that the domain of "N" be dense, and the equality includes the assertion that the domain of "N*N" equals that of "NN*", which is not necessarily the case in general.
_	This is equivalent to the assertion that every Hilbert space has an orthonormal basis.
_	Despite the assertion that alcoholic Korsakoff syndrome must be caused by the use of alcohol, there have been several cases where it has developed from other instances of thiamine deficiency resulting from gross malnutrition due to conditions such as; stomach cancer, anorexia nervosa, and gastrectomy.
_	Taglines included the assertion that the store was home of the "decent boys".
_	Their Honours rejected the assertion that there was a preference for American decisions, or any disregard for British decisions, instead holding that the distinction was based on the deliberate adoption by the framers of the Australian Constitution of the language of the United States Constitution and a rejection of the scheme of the Canadian Constitution.
_	Nightingale suggested that the storyline "echoed" the assertion that a woman cannot be trusted to make her own decision about abortion, which she describes as profoundly undermining and a "subtle" reinforcement of an "underlying implication" that women should be punished for exercising their legal right.
_	Rathbone herself was confronted by Rama Rau, an Indian feminist, who said that the British were simply not well-placed to understand Indian culture and that "educated Indian women were working in every province of their country to eradicate social evils and outmoded customs and prejudices, and we refused to accept the assertion that the removal of social evils in Indian society was the responsibility of the British."
_	Besides, the assertion that the screw shaft and engine remained undamaged and unchanged in shape is also a laughing shock.
_	One of the central themes of the discussion among English child abuse professionals was the assertion that people should simply "believe the children", and that the testimony of children was sufficient proof, which ignored the fact that in many cases the testimony of children was interpreted by professionals rather than the children explicitly disclosing allegations of abuse.
_	"The Sun" printed the assertion that "Furious MPs last night demanded a ban on "EastEnders" as the BBC soap showed two men kissing full on the lips".
_	Though the judge, Sir Erskine Perry, decided the case in favor of the Khoja leaders, his findings included the assertion that the Khojas were a “Muhammedian” group (one with primarily Hindu practices, according to Perry), and that the 14th century Ismaili da'i, Pir Sadruddin, had converted the Khojas to Islam.
_	In this revolutionary and groundbreaking paper, the work for which Shannon had substantially completed at Bell Labs by the end of 1944, Shannon for the first time introduced the qualitative and quantitative model of communication as a statistical process underlying information theory, opening with the assertion that
_	Butler is also sceptical of the Albyrak suggestion stating while the assertion that Batholomew "preached and died in Armenia is possible, and is a unanimous tradition among the later historians of that country; ... earlier Armenian writers make little or no reference to him as connected with their nation".
_	Some of the Syriac terms that Ephrem used to describe his community were later used to describe monastic communities, but the assertion that he was monk is anachronistic.
_	One prominent Jewish socialist was quick to dismiss the idea of a semi-autonomous Jewish federation paralleling the Bund with the assertion that "in America special Russian Jewish wounds do not exist; thus, here in America there can be no place and no value for special Russian Jewish remedies."
_	Here, the careful yet effortlessly spontaneous way in which Cook Ding is described cutting up the ox is both an example of the cognitive state of mind Zhuangzi associated with the Tao and the assertion that this state is accessible in everyday life.
_	However an article published in a number of American news publications rejected the assertion that Arafat had AIDS, stating, "An Israeli infectious disease specialist said he would have performed the test, if only to be thorough and to refute the rumors that surrounded the case.
_	This deals with astronomy and theoretical physics and the ultimate fate of the universe, in particular the search for understanding of dark matter and dark energy and includes discussion of: the work of astronomers Vesto Slipher and then Edwin Hubble in demonstrating the universe is expanding; Vera Rubin's investigation of galaxy rotation curves that suggest something other than gravity is preventing galaxies from spinning apart, which led to the revival of unobserved "dark matter" theory; experimental efforts to discover dark matter, including the search for the hypothetical neutralino and other weakly interacting massive particles); the study of supernovae at Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory and Harvard University (under Robert Kirshner) that point to an accelerating universe powered by "dark energy" possibly Vacuum energy; and finally the assertion that the proposed modified Newtonian dynamics hypothesis and the accelerating universe disproves the dark matter theory.
_	They challenge the assertion that Mao was responsible for 70 million deaths, since the number's origin is vague and substantiation shaky.
_	The modern Maronite Church, however, rejects the assertion that the Maronites were ever monothelites apart from the rest of the Catholic Church; and the question remains a major controversy to this day.
_	Cynthia and Tony Revell (1984) "Mr Benson remembered in Rye, and the world of Tilling" cited Sir Steven Runciman (1903–2000), a Cambridge historian who knew Benson well, and Benson's manservant Charlie Tomalin (d.1981) for the assertion that Riseholme was based on Broadway.
_	The Goddard–Thorn theorem amounts to the assertion that this quantization functor more or less cancels the addition of two free bosons, as conjectured by Lovelace in 1971.
_	Such reflections are intended by Heidegger to assist in the following gesture: the assertion that the hearth, named by the chorus, is being.
_	This connection supports the assertion that overestimation occurs in order to fill in the length of time omitted by saccadic masking.
_	Both of these groups are also primarily focused on U.S. policy, defying the assertion that networked advocacy can only operate in a transnational context.
_	Backpackers want to experience the "real" destination rather than the packaged version often associated with mass tourism, which has led to the assertion that backpackers are anti-tourist.
_	PolitiFact found the assertion that Clinton changed her views on a nuclear deal with India in response to donations to her family's foundation to be false.
_	The Treaty of Tordesillas was invoked by Chile in the 20th century to defend the principle of an Antarctic sector extending along a meridian to the South Pole, as well as the assertion that the treaty made Spanish (or Portuguese) all undiscovered land south to the Pole.
_	The company sought $200 million in damages on one of the poorest countries on Central America, a total that has since increased to $300 million, the basis for this is the assertion that government "changed the rules of the game" on the company.
_	The Chief Baron began by dismissing as a matter of law the assertion that Fowler's knowledge of overloading could be intended after verdict.
_	The Japu Sahib is, like Japji Sahib, a praise of God as the unchanging, loving, unborn, ultimate power and includes within it 950 names of God, starting with Brahma, Shiva, Vishnu and moving on to over 900 names and avatars of gods and goddesses found in Hindu traditions, with the assertion that these are all manifestations of the One, the limitless eternal creator.
_	The North Carolina General Assembly passed a resolution in 1985 which repudiated the Connecticut statement and gave "no credence" to the assertion that Whitehead was first to fly, citing "leading aviation historians and the world's largest aviation museum" who determined that there was "no historic fact, documentation, record or research to support the claim".
_	In contrast to Jabotinsky, Weizmann requested a political declaration on the rights of the Jewish population in Israel, in the assertion that British have a strategic interest to help to Jewish population, in order to have a hold of that area.
_	However, the assertion that these salicylic acid derivates had been synthesized for non-therapeutic reasons is demonstrably false.
_	For example, making the assertion that " 'Snow is white' is true" is equivalent to asserting "Snow is white".
_	This argument has been challenged with the assertion that the hidden reasons premise is as plausible as the premise that God does not exist or is not "an almighty, all-knowing, all-benevolent, all-powerful".
_	One of the controversial findings asserted in the opening of the bill is the assertion that Internet gambling is a growing problem for banks and credit card companies.
_	Jensen is uncertain about the assertion that he is South Dakota's most conservative politician, describing himself as simply a true Reagan conservative; but asserts that "too many" members of his own party are Republicans In Name Only.
_	"Anathomia" opens with the assertion that human beings are superior to all other creatures because of their intellect, reasoning ability, tool-making abilities, and upright stature; because he possesses these noble qualities, man is worthy to be studied.
_	It has a cellar door, extant and viewable from the basement, though covered over, that would have allowed a community cellar easily accessed from the north wall of cabin, facing Huron Street; 4. Two remaining exterior cabin walls (now interior walls) are leaning west indicating the weakness and simpleness of the original structure prior to the front structure being moved here; 5. Original cabin floor boards and roof boards measure in excess of 18"; 6. The original chimney to the cabin exists albeit it served a wood stove not a fireplace; 7. Structural evidence in the cabin's attic and cellar support the assertion that the front 2-story house was moved to this site; 8. Very early window sash and glass exists, presumably from the cabin, that were relocated to newly created outside walls in the late 1800s, glass being blue; 9. Patching in of molding, siding, plaster indicate the front house was part of a greater house and changes were made to it after being moved here; 10.
_	Evidence to support the assertion that epidural analgesia increases the risk of anastomotic breakdown following bowel surgery is lacking.
_	Conservatives reject the assertion that different laws prescribed for men and women imply that men are more valuable than women.
_	The argument centres on the assertion that short-rotation management on either biological or financial rotations leads to significant loses of wood production potential as well as external costs to society.
_	St Clement Eastcheap's claim is based on the assertion that it was close to the wharf where citrus fruit was unloaded.
_	Discourse starts with the assertion that the public/private divide has meaningfully contributed to women’s marginalization.
_	Much of Chomsky's theory is founded on the poverty of the stimulus (POTS) argument, the assertion that a child's linguistic data is so limited and corrupted that learning language from this data alone is impossible.
_	This asserts that phylogenetic applications of parsimony assume that all similarity is homologous (other interpretations, such as the assertion that two organisms might "not" be related at all, are nonsensical).
_	The amateur historian Geoffrey M. Footner supports the assertion that the ship was rebuilt in 1854 but traces its lineage to 1797.
_	A 2010 Eurobarometer poll on violence against women found that victim blaming attitudes are common in Denmark: 71% of Danes agreed with the assertion that the "provocative behaviour of women" was a cause of violence against women, well above the 52% European average.
_	They also argued that the Urdu language originated in India, asserted that Urdu could also be spoken fluently by most of the people and disputed the assertion that official status of language and script is essential for the spread of education.
_	The argument put forth by the Ashland attorney was solely justified by the assertion that traditional marriages contribute to a more stable birth rate, which in turn bolsters the state's economic health.
_	The film ends with the assertion that only Jesus can free people from sexual slavery.
_	and Cedric Tille agree with the assertion that U.S. foreign assets are currently undervalued.
_	The phrase is used particularly in the assertion that the economy of India could overtake the economy of the United States and economy of China as the largest national economy in the world, a position it held from 1 to 1500 A.D. and in 1700 A.D.
_	Jocano lists the various streams of the evidence which support the assertion that this influence reached the Philippines include:""Syllabic writing; artifacts in the form of different figurines made of clay, gold, and bronze that were dug in various sites in the Philippines; and 336 loanwords identified by Professor Francisco to be Sanskrit in origin, with 150 of them identified as the origin of some major Philippine terms."
_	Joseph Benkert and Jeffrey Gordon repeated the assertion that thirty former captives had returned to the battlefield in testimony before the United States Congress.
_	Indonesia initially rejected the assertion that the islands belonged to Malaysia and both countries brought the dispute to the International Court of Justice.
_	More recent research, however, contradicts the assertion that heterosexual women are largely monogamous.
_	Lawyers for Al-Fayed also accepted that there was no evidence to support the assertion that Diana was illegally embalmed in order to cover up a pregnancy, a "pregnancy" that they accepted, could not be established by any medical evidence.
_	In the field of classical studies, it often refers to the assertion that an author is ignorant of a subject, based on the lack of references to it in the author's available writings.
_	Glenn Hubbard, who preceded Mankiw as Bush's CEA chair, also disputed the assertion that tax cuts increase tax revenues, writing in his 2003 Economic Report of the President: "Although the economy grows in response to tax reductions (because of higher consumption in the short run and improved incentives in the long run), it is unlikely to grow so much that lost tax revenue is completely recovered by the higher level of economic activity."
_	However acceptance of many of the attributions of Roman works to Bigot is notably lower in Italy; the Galeria Doria Pamphili in Rome still attribute the boy with candle above to "Maestro Giacomo", and the National Gallery at Palazzo Barberini hang works attributed to Bigot and the Candlelight Master in the same room, with the assertion that the styles and lighting are different.
_	Most writers doubt the assertion that the "Guiguzi" was written by a single personality, Guigu Xiansheng (鬼谷先生), who was said in the "Records of the Grand Historian" to have been the teacher of the late Warring States political lobbyists Su Qin and Zhang Yi.
_	Kirk initially responded that he was "strongly offended by the assertion that our process has been non-transparent and lacked public participation" and that it was actually far more transparent than the negotiations for prior free trade agreements.
_	Vertov responds to their criticisms with the assertion that the critics were hacks nipping "revolutionary effort" in the bud, and concludes the essay with his promise to "explode art's tower of Babel."
_	They were commanded by John Riley, an Irish artilleryman and veteran non-commissioned officer of the British Army, who possibly arrived in Canada in 1843 whilst serving in the British Army (the assertion that he served as a Sergeant in the 66th (Berkshire) Regiment of Foot, is known to be inaccurate) going on to join the U.S. Army in Michigan in September 1845.
_	The review makes the assertion that Price had a preconceived positive notion about the health of primitive people, which led to data of questionable value and conclusions that ignored important problems known to afflict their societies, such as periodontal disease.
_	In 1633 one Robert Ashley dedicated his translation of an Italian work on Cochin China to Abbot, and attributes to him the assertion that "the remotest traffique is always the most beneficiall to the publick stocke, and the trade to East Indies doth farre excell all other".
_	She graduates from Lawndale High, winning the Dian Fossey Award "for dazzling academic achievements in face of near total misanthropy", and crowning her acceptance speech with the assertion that "there is no aspect, no facet, no moment of life that can't be improved with pizza".
_	Again, it is uncertain whether he wrote a book, but the many traditions that are handed down in his name by Ibn Ishaq and other writers justify the assertion that he was the founder of Islamic history.
_	The review ended with the assertion that the "principals have some growing to do."
_	Despite the government's arguments to the contrary, including the assertion that Trafton and Glendale were simply trying to defraud the Federal Government, the United States Supreme Court sided with Glendale.
_	Victim blaming is also prevalent in many societies, including in Western countries: a 2010 Eurobarometer poll found that 52% of respondents agreed with the assertion that the "provocative behaviour of women" was a cause of violence against women; with respondents in Cyprus, Denmark, Estonia, Finland, Latvia, Lithuania, Malta and Slovenia being most likely to agree with the assertion (more than 70% in each of these countries).
_	On the other hand, the assertion that spiritual truths can be proven from a scientific point of view, was a constant theme of Blavatsky's claims.
_	From a perch it will walk into the water and deliberately submerge, but there is no truth in the assertion that it can defy the laws of specific gravity and walk along the bottom.
_	"The Sun" printed the assertion that "Furious MPs last night demanded a ban on "EastEnders" as the BBC soap showed two men kissing full on the lips".
_	The Kentucky Resolutions of 1799 added the assertion that when a federal law is unconstitutional, the remedy is "nullification" of the law by "the several states."
_	Diaz himself dismissed the assertion that marijuana was a Performance-enhancing drug, or that he was smoking it prior to the fight.
_	Queer anti-urbanism is a term used within the field of queer studies to describe theoretical viewpoints which challenge the validity of the assertion that queer identity/practice(s) is inseparable from the urban.
_	Two issues closely related to the arbitration question were the sovereign equality of states and the assertion that military conquest should generate no territorial rights for the victory.
_	Although the pope thereupon revised the text of the Bull and reissued it under the original date, he incarcerated Bonagrazia and in the Bull "Cum inter nonnullos" (12 November 1323) declared heretical the assertion that Christ and the Apostles possessed no property either separately or collectively.
_	Lampard phoned in, objecting to the assertion that he was "weak" and "scum" and said that he had fought "tooth and nail" to keep his family together.
_	A judge refused to amend her original case in March 2017, noting that Kesha had entered a contract after the time period that the singer alleges that abusive behavior began and contradicting the assertion that any alleged abuse would have been unforeseeable and suggesting that Dr. Luke's alleged abusive behavior would have been foreseeable.
_	The defence case relied heavily on the assertion that the fatal shot was unintentional and the result of a hang fire.
_	This corroborates the assertion that many Mormons are satisfied with the communal aspect and attributes of LDS Church life.
_	"The evidence seems to us to be notably inadequate for the assertion that the use in war of chemical substances specifically toxic to plants is prohibited by international law."
_	It is known that Nagata's conjecture on algebraic curves is equivalent to the assertion that for more than nine general points, the Seshadri constants of the projective plane are maximal.
_	Spectrum Sports, Inc. v. McQuillan, 506 U.S. 447 (1993), was a case in which the Supreme Court of the United States rejected the assertion that attempted monopolization may be proven merely by demonstration of unfair or predatory conduct.
_	Räikkönen's outburst ended with the assertion that he would not be driving for Renault in 2011 under any circumstances, though the team claimed they were only ever answering questions posed to them by the media, with the potential return of Räikkönen being the source of interest to the press.
_	The Biblical Book of Ezekiel provides substantiation for the assertion that souls experience mortality, “Behold, all souls are Mine; The soul of the father As well as the soul of the son is Mine; The soul who sins shall die."
_	Hilbert's example: "the assertion that either there are only finitely many prime numbers or there are infinitely many" (quoted in Davis 2000:97); and Brouwer's: "Every mathematical species is either finite or infinite."
_	Former Eurovision TV director Bjørn Erichsen disagreed with the assertion that regional bloc voting significantly affects the contest's outcome, saying that Russia's first victory in 2008 was only possible with votes from thirty-eight of the participating countries.
_	"Sex Roles: A Journal of Research" publication, "The interpersonal power of feminism: Is feminism good for relationships?" was well known in that it made the assertion that feminists make better lovers than non-feminists and sparked a stir in the academic community.
_	According to Zafrullah Khan, the assertion that the award of the Batala and Gurdaspur tehsils to India did not 'affect' Kashmir is far-fetched.
_	"Indeed, I believe the assertion that there is such a doctrine lends greater coherence to the administration's policies than they deserve."
_	So-called systems have often been characterized and challenged in the assertion that they abrogate the distinction between good and evil, and destroy freedom.
_	It opens with the assertion that: “A man may enter the faith in many ways, yet be expelled from it by just one deed.
_	Nevertheless, Doblin said that Pahnke's study cast "a considerable doubt on the assertion that mystical experiences catalyzed by drugs are in any way inferior to non-drug mystical experiences in both their immediate content and long-term effects".
_	Winch expands on the assertion that "The womance can be distinguished from earlier friendship films because of its focus on the female self as entrepreneurial self-project."
_	The decision rested on the assertion that minimum resale price maintenance is indistinguishable in economic effect from naked horizontal price fixing by a cartel.
_	The earnings-related supplement was based on the assertion that a person's commitments for mortgages, rents, and hire purchase agreements were related to their normal earnings and could not be adjusted quickly when experiencing a loss of normal income.
_	The 2009 excavations also provided evidence contrary to the assertion that all platforms in Costa Rica are circular, because both a figure-eight-shaped platform and a peanut-shaped platform were excavated.
_	The film ends with the assertion that only Jesus can completely heal people from the horrors of sexual slavery.
_	On August 6, 2015, a quo warranto petition was submitted by socio-political analyst and radio commentator Rizalito David to the SET to remove Poe from her seat in the Senate based on the assertion that, as a foundling of unknown parentage, she is not a natural-born Filipino citizen.
_	It is also suggested however that the pain modulated by the mu-opioid receptor and that modulated by the δ-opioid receptor are distinct types, with the assertion that DOR modulates the nociception of chronic pain, while MOR modulates acute pain.
_	It is the assertion that "there is no outside-text" ("il n'y a pas de hors-texte"), which is often mistranslated as "there is nothing outside of the text".
_	The presence of sophisticated hearing organs in both males and females supports the assertion that communication by sound plays an important role in the lives of the "Panoploscelis".
_	To support the assertion that children do better when they are not taught traditional arithmetic, Anne Goodrow, in her PhD thesis at Tufts University, compared subtraction strategies of students taught traditional methods with those who used constructivist methods with "Investigations curriculum".
_	Another argument that was made to support the later dating was the assertion that, given the parallels, Yeghishe's "History of Vardan" is simply an adaptation of the late fifth century Armenian historian Ghazar Parpetsi's "History of Armenia".
_	After the death of Choi Yong-Sool in 1986, Ji came forward with the assertion that it was he who founded the Korean art of hapkido, asserting that Choi Yong-Sool taught only yawara based skills and that it was he who added much of the kicking and weapon techniques we now associate with modern hapkido.
_	The most important assessment was the assertion that
_	It related to the fabricated Popish Plot, and the assertion that the early Whig William Russell, Lord Russell interfered to prevent the mitigation of the punishment of being hanged, drawn and quartered for high treason, in the case of Viscount Stafford, on the presentation of the petition of Sheriffs Slingsby Bethel and Henry Cornish to the House of Commons on 23 December 1680.
_	ZAPU's official response to Hoey's motion included the assertion that in all conflicts "civilians get caught up in cross-fires due to faulty intelligence reports and other communication errors", and juxtaposed the civilians killed in the Viscount shootdowns with those killed at Chikumbi.
_	The fragments of the work "On the Resurrection" begin with the assertion that the truth, and God the author of truth, need no witness, but that as a concession to the weakness of men it is necessary to give arguments to convince those who gainsay it.
_	The Sandžak Democratic Party, one of the rival parties identified by Imamović, rejected the assertion that anyone sought to harm Ugljanin, let alone assassinate him.
_	In contrast, "constructivism is an epistemological premise grounded on the assertion that, in the act of knowing, it is the human mind that actively gives meaning and order to that reality to which it is responding".
_	Toobin disputed the assertion that he improperly removed documents.
_	The Peter–Weyl theorem—specifically the assertion that the characters form an orthonormal "basis" for the space of square-integrable class functions—plays a key role in the classification of the irreducible representations of a connected compact Lie group.
_	Scientists disagreed with the assertion that intelligent design is scientific, and its introduction into the science curriculum of a Pennsylvania school district led to the 2005 "Kitzmiller v. Dover Area School District" trial, which ruled that the "intelligent design" arguments are essentially religious in nature and not science.
_	In light of this report, it seems there may be some exaggeration in the assertion that Bowen-Colthurst then made "frantic efforts to wipe out all the traces of his crime", as a Father M. Scannell alleged many years later in a letter to Hanna Sheehy Skeffington.
_	Vickers has encountered criticism for his extremely short residency in Alaska, but has countered with the assertion that over the course of his life he has spent a considerable amount of time in the state.
_	The main stream of discussion starts from the well-known opening of Chapter 1, with the assertion that all technical arts, all investigations (every "methodos", including the "Ethics" itself), indeed all deliberate actions and choice, all aim at some good apart from themselves.
_	A study was done testing college students' tolerance for ambiguity and found that students who were involved in the arts had higher scores than business students on ambiguity tolerance, from which the assertion that creativity is linked to the construct.
_	The centrality of marriage in peoples' life is no longer so strong: in the European Values Study (EVS) of 2008, the percentage of respondents who agreed with the assertion that "Marriage is an outdated institution" was 34.3% in Belgium.
_	Filmed independently and inexpensively, the documentary makes the assertion that Noah's Ark, from the biblical flood narrative, has been found on the slopes of Mount Ararat in Turkey, though physical and political difficulties prevent a more extensive study of the alleged vessel.
_	The modified grand Riemann hypothesis is the assertion that the nontrivial zeros of all automorphic "L"-functions lie on the critical line or the real line.
_	This dissertation was published concurrently with "The Nature of True Virtue", and the two works have much in common, specifically the assertion that God's aim in creating the world was not human happiness but his own glory.
_	Evidence "overwhelmingly" supports the assertion that the prayer was actually written not by Maimonides, but by German Jewish doctor Markus Herz or a contemporary.
_	Fox Television planned a launch of their own "FX Channel", and Mruvka sued them with the assertion that Fox had prior knowledge of his use of the initials.
_	After a thorough discussion of truth theories, Sadegh-Zadeh shows that there is sufficient evidence to support the assertion that medical truths are system-relative, and are produced within the respective health care systems themselves.
_	Broadcloak further taunts the young Roland with the assertion that his adult self killed his friends, and now walks alone on an endless path to the Dark Tower.
_	Theosophists accepted his theory but rejected the assertion that life originated from matter, and not from spirit.
_	The core beliefs of the sect center around this idea, and the assertion that Amaterasu is the source of all light and life, and creator of all the universe.
_	"(Note that the assertion that he would have won the Nobel Prize in 1953 is likely false, although he was nominated for the prize that year.")
_	Kruger dismissed all such entreaties with the assertion that enfranchising "these new-comers, these disobedient persons" might imperil the republic's independence.
_	An example used in the movie is the assertion that psychiatrists seek to label typical shyness as a "social anxiety disorder"; however, patients are diagnosed with a social anxiety disorder only at debilitating levels, where there is an ""intense" fear in social situations".
_	In addition to a tribute to the Luria, the work contains the assertion that it is one of God's greatest pleasures to witness the promotion of the teaching of the Kabbalah, since this alone can assure the coming of the Jewish Messiah.
_	A cholera expert, John Mekalanos, supported the assertion that it was important to know where and how the disease emerged because the strain is a "novel, virulent strain previously unknown in the Western Hemisphere and health officials need to know how it spreads."
_	In the past decades, social views on the traditional family have changed markedly, which is reflected in the high proportion of cohabitation and births outside of marriage, and in a questioning of traditional expectations regarding the family; in the European Values Study (EVS) of 2008, 35.4% of respondents in France agreed with the assertion that "Marriage is an outdated institution".
_	In a 2013 Romanian survey, 30.9% of respondents agreed with the assertion that "women are sometimes beaten due to their own fault".
_	After the conquest of Constantinople, Mehmed claimed the title "Caesar" of the Roman Empire ("Qayser-i Rûm"), based on the assertion that Constantinople had been the seat and capital of the Roman Empire since 330 AD, and whoever possessed the Imperial capital was the ruler of the Empire.
_	This is directly contradictory to the assertion that a bodhisattva cannot be born a female.
_	China's experience supports the assertion that globalization greatly increases wealth for poor countries.
_	Invalid seeks to address this issue through the assertion that their claim is "unshamed" from the get-go.
_	This theme continued with the assertion that "present governments are encouraging separatism in Australia by providing opportunities, land, moneys and facilities available only to Aboriginals".
_	Below are some indications that would tend to support the assertion that for more than the last thousand years
_	The generalized Collatz conjecture is the assertion that every integer, under iteration by "f", eventually falls into one of the four cycles above or the cycle 0 → 0.
_	The discourse concludes with the assertion that the one who fails to obtain guidance from Book like the Qur'an, can have no ether source in the world to afford him Guidance.
_	Commentators have pointed out that the assertion that the Grand Architect of the Universe is the Christian God "is not evident on the basis of 'natural theology' alone but requires an additional 'leap of faith' based on the revelation of the Bible".
_	In 1913, Hermann von Soden’s work on the Greek New Testament seemed to confirm the assertion that this family descended from a common archetype.
_	Upon his death, he was eulogized in the "Transactions of the Unitarian Historical Society" with the assertion that few men "have rendered more conspicuous service than Robert Mortimer Montgomery to culture in general and education in particular".
_	The law is important for the mathematical formulation of thermodynamics, which needs the assertion that the relation of thermal equilibrium is an equivalence relation.
_	This has nevertheless been seen as inconsistent by some scholars (for instance Mark Pollack) who take issue with the assertion that informational advantages only allow national governments to gain freedom from European electorates and that the same principle applies with European institutions gaining an advantage over their principals through informational asymmetries.
_	In 1972, months before the U.S. pullout pursuant to the Paris Peace Accords, investigative journalist Jack Anderson cited the open letter authored by Kellen as authority for the assertion that communist military morale in Vietnam was high.
_	Black knowledge, he argued, would not only undermine the assertion that blacks were inherently inferior; it would terrify whites.
_	Liberal Christians condemn the notion because, as Hans Küng put it, "It would be impossible to find anywhere in the world a sincere Jew, Muslim or atheist who would not regard the assertion that he is an 'anonymous Christian' as presumptuous".
_	Hari's steadfast refusal to speak in his own defence, and his sticking to an unconvincing denial and the assertion that he hadn't met Daphne on that fateful night, seems suspicious to British and Indians alike.
_	Seeking to defend the assertion that humans can become like God through deification without compromising God's transcendence, Palamas distinguished between God's inaccessible essence and the energies through which he becomes known and enables to share his divine life.
_	The discovery of thousands of years old shards from Indus Valley ruins was also used as evidence to challenge the assertion that kulhars biodegrade rapidly and are environmentally superior.
_	While these published case-studies tend to support the assertion that the DNMS is effective, they do not meet the criteria for empirical research.
_	He responded to one criticism at length, the assertion that "On Genetic Interests" commits the naturalistic fallacy, i.e. attempts to deduce values from facts.
_	A number of Native Americans in Iowa and the Dakotas have opposed the pipeline, including the Meskwaki and several Sioux tribal nations, under the assertion that the pipeline would threaten sacred burial grounds as well as the quality of water in the area.
_	This study – published in the online journal "PloS Medicine" – confirmed and extended the conclusions made in the article and goes further to disprove the assertion that the lethal-injection process is painless.
_	Crucial to his analysis is the assertion that the common factor in boom-and-bust is the creation of debt to finance speculation, which "becomes dangerously out of scale in relation to the underlying means of payment."
_	Since the book provided statistical data supporting the assertion that blacks were, on average, less intelligent than whites, some people have feared that "The Bell Curve" could be used by extremists to justify genocide and hate crimes.
_	Hence the assertion that he was a Shammaite, though he was a disciple of Johanan ben Zakai, who was one of Hillel the Elder's most prominent pupils.
_	As an aged veteran, he is extremely fond of bayonet warfare ("the cold steel"), and usually meets any queries about this with the assertion that "they don't like it up 'em!", a phrase which writer Jimmy Perry remembered an old campaigner using, during his own service in the Home Guard.
_	The Van der Waerden theorem itself is the assertion that is finite, and it follows from the base case and the induction steps.
_	In the case of inaccessibility, the corresponding axiom is the assertion that for every cardinal μ, there is an inaccessible cardinal κ which is strictly larger, μ < κ.
_	It also demands a "return to the principles of Austrian Economics", and the assertion that healthcare is "not a right" but "a service" that can be addressed only by using "market based solutions".
_	This is the earliest positively identified historical source for the assertion that Voss rejected chances for a safe retreat that were open to him.
_	Chomsky commented in an email exchange with the Znet blogger Joe Emersberger that the report was "deceptive" because of the omission of his comparison of the case of Chelsea Manning (then known as Bradley Manning) with the arrested Venezuelan judge, among other points, and rejected the assertion that Venezuela was less democratic than before Chávez took office: "I don’t think so, and never suggested it."
_	In October 1876, in an effort to refute the assertion that carrying the ball had been an ancient tradition, he wrote to "The Meteor", the Rugby School magazine, that he had learnt from an unnamed source that the change from a kicking game to a handling game had ""..originated with a town boy or foundationer of the name of Ellis, William Webb Ellis"".
_	One item that seemed to have annoyed him was the assertion that he had based the character of Paul Dombey ("Dombey and Son") on Thomas Chapman, one of the principal partners at John Chapman & Co. Dickens immediately fired off a letter to Lewis Gaylord Clark, editor of the New York literary magazine "The Knickerbocker", saying that Powell was a forger and thief.
_	Research also supports the assertion that music and rhyme increase a child's ability in spatial reasoning, which aid mathematics skills.
_	However, in the past, commercial airlines have prevented the use of cell phones and laptops, due to the assertion that the frequencies emitted from these devices may disturb the radio waves contact of the airplane.
_	Upon hearing yet again the assertion that he was "ruthless", Kennedy once joked to a reporter, "If I find out who has called me ruthless I will destroy him."
_	About this time a claim by the earl of Menteith to the earldom of Strathearn, which was based on the assertion that Robert III, husband of Annabella Drummond, was illegitimate, roused the poet's pride of blood and prompted him to prepare an historical defence of his house.
_	While the notion that petroleum production must peak at some point is not controversial, the assertion that this must coincide with a serious economic decline, or even that the decline in production will necessarily be caused by an exhaustion of available reserves, is not universally accepted.
_	He also makes the assertion that "the death... of a beautiful woman" is "unquestionably the most poetical topic in the world".
_	Faced with the assertion that humans would have been better off without free will, he argued that the possibility of sin is necessary for a perfect world, and so individuals are responsible for their sin.
_	An editorial in the "Battle Creek Enquirer" contested the assertion that there is no alternative to fixing roads but Proposal 1: "Proposal 1 proponents are calling the initiative our best—even only—hope for addressing the state's crumbling infrastructure.
_	The evidence that he had attended traditional funerals and participated in their rites and inherited land according to customary law also contradicted the assertion that he had severed all connection with his clan and tribe.
_	In short, neuroimagery and anatomical studies support the assertion that the caudate plays a role in executive functioning, while behavioral studies deepen our understanding of the ways in which the caudate guides some of our decision-making processes.
_	The trial testimony that resulted from such methods was often contradictory and vague on all details except for the assertion that the abuse had occurred.
_	The above explanation is based purely on the fact that the dog was described as 'Striped' and the assertion that no domesticated dogs have 'Striped' markings.
_	A concurrent use application may be filed with respect to a trademark which is already registered or otherwise in use by another party, but may be allowed to go forward based on the assertion that the existing use can co-exist with the new registration without causing consumer confusion.
_	"Given the Rules' permissive backdrop and their inclusion of a specific rule on expert testimony that does not mention 'general acceptance,' the assertion that the Rules somehow assimilated "Frye" is unconvincing.
_	Kahn recruited Jenna with the assertion that Charlotte left enough money in her will to afford Marshall another eye surgery.
_	Kenneth Pomeranz, a noted critic of the theory, rejects the assertion that "certain Asian societies were headed toward an industrial breakthrough until Manchu or British invaders crushed the 'sprouts of capitalism'".
_	In many cases this imprecise definition means little more than the assertion that the topology in question arises "naturally" or "canonically" (see mathematical jargon) in the given context.
_	To test the validity of the assertion that the magnetic anomaly was indeed the result of lightning and not another process, Maki (2005) tested the soil samples against known standards indicative of LIRM anomalies developed by Dunlop et al. (1984), Wasilewski and Kletetschka (1999), and Verrier and Rochette (2002).
_	The Rev. Denny Wayman of the Free Methodist Church made the assertion that "The Golden Compass" is a "film trying to preach an atheistic message".
_	The editorial, which also promoted the hashtag #WeAreIndiana with the assertion that "Indiana embraces everyone and we do not discriminate", was published in the context of a larger general backlash against the Indiana law.
_	The claim was based on the assertion that the inquiry had not been lawfully commissioned by state cabinet and that it had acted outside its powers.
_	"As for the assertion that they were hung up in the Ka'ba, it is not known to any of those who have handed down ancient poems."
_	The palaeontologist and influential environmental activist Tim Flannery made the assertion that the concept of clean coal might not be viable for all geographical locations.
_	FAIR has criticized US media coverage of Venezuelan President Hugo Chávez, taking issue with the assertion that "Hugo Chávez is an autocrat who has consolidated one-party rule."
_	The term is not to be confused with American exceptionalism, which is the assertion that the United States is qualitatively different from other nations and is often accompanied by the notion that the United States has superiority over every other nation.
_	In Austrian economics, intertemporal equilibrium refers to the assertion that the economy at any one time is in disequilibrium, and that it is only when looking at it over the long term that it is in equilibrium.
_	Her theme was the assertion that Dr. Wilhelm Lautenbach's program for productive employment, had it been adopted in 1931, could have ended the depression and prevented the Nazis' rise to power, and that the adoption of her husband's Eurasian Land-Bridge proposal today can avert a similar disaster.
_	Author Peter Brune supports the assertion that pressure by MacArthur for results was a factor that increased Allied casualties, but argues that it was Herring's willingness to respond to such pressure that exacerbated the issue; he also argues that this pressure resulted in inadequate provisions being made to provide sufficient artillery pieces and shells.
_	Woodbury disagreed with the assertion that the federal government had jurisdiction over every river that was controlled by the ocean's tide, because citizens who had gotten into accidents on the water would have to travel further distances when the federal government was involved rather than settling the dispute near the area where it happened.
_	Despite the assertion that Theodorus apparently did not want the rank of a father or this world's glory, he consented.
_	Hayek, and later Austrian School economists agree that if a population saves more money, total revenues for companies will decline, but they deny the assertion that lower revenues lead to lower economic growth, understanding that the additional savings are used to create more capital to increase production.
_	The defendants were accused of violating the expenditure limit implemented by the FECA, with the assertion that the independent contribution was in violation of the Act.
_	The urgency of this "Wake Up Call" was based on the assertion that then-current trends among teenagers would result in an inevitable decline in the number of "Bible-based believers:"
_	Edward Hasted made the assertion that although the wells were originally named the "Queen's-Wells", they soon took on the name of Tunbridge Wells due to their proximity to the town of Tonbridge (then known as "Tunbridge"):
_	There are reports that attribute to Mohammed Al-Masari the assertion that Iraq's leader Saddam Hussein contacted Afghan Arabs in late 2001, following the American invasion, inviting them to find refuge in Iraq.
_	Several decades after "Dr Miles", scholars began to question the assertion that minimum resale price maintenance, a vertical restraint, was the economic equivalent of a naked horizontal cartel.
_	He sought to quash it on the assertion that his plea agreement prevented his being forced to testify before the Virginia grand jury.
_	Others contest the assertion that kappa "takes into account" chance agreement.
_	This leads to the assertion that Yamatai had its own primitive system of law, perhaps court law, which enabled it to maintain government over competing clan laws.
_	According to Goodall, this undermines the assertion that builders had to seek permission from the Crown.
_	Here, it has been given new meaning as a pop culture reference to Elvis Presley's infamous swiveling hips, satirizing the assertion that they, and by extension rock 'n' roll, had caused the "decline of Western Civilization" and given rise to 'disposable teens'.
_	Among other arguments he cited the prominent role of Arabs in Israeli society to address Haas' support of the assertion that Israel is "apartheid on steroids".
_	Comrade Stalin spoke about Azerbaijani poet Nizami and quoted his works in order to break, using the very words of the poet, the groundlessness of the assertion that this great poet of our fraternal Azerbaijani nation was to be given to Iranian literature only because he supposedly wrote most of his poems in the Iranian language.
_	Multiple studies of both morphological and molecular characters have strongly supported the assertion that the Sequoioideae are monophyletic.
_	His testimony was rebutted by Dr. Michael Lamb, a psychiatrist, who stated that there was no scientific evidence for the assertion that homosexuals were worse parents than heterosexuals.
_	Also false was the assertion that the poems in the book were products of Indian culture - they were original works; none was actually a translation.
_	While otoacoustic emissions do exist, there is no evidence to support the assertion that these play a role in sound localization, nor is any mechanism for this "interference" effect claimed by Zuccarelli supported.
_	Her platform included the assertion that men and women were equal, that it was natural for men and women to cooperate, that laws have tended to restrict women's access to education and full independence, and that it was unlawful to tax women when they had no voice in government.
_	TV3 responded with the assertion that they were not responsible for the content of the programme; it was an infomercial, due to its broadcast time.
_	Under (reductive) physicalism, one is inclined to believe either that anyone including oneself might be a zombie, or that no one can be a zombie – following from the assertion that one's own conviction about being, or not being a zombie is (just) a product of the physical world and is therefore no different from anyone else's.
_	In the wake of the murder of Sergey Kirov at the end of 1934 the ECCI underwent a general "personnel purge", and Rubiner was the subject of a denunciation from a cell within the ECCI criticising her "insufficient vigilance", based on the assertion that she had numbered among her acquaintances ECCI colleagues identified as "enemies of the people".
_	A number of Native Americans in Iowa and the Dakotas have opposed the pipeline, including the Meskwaki and several Sioux tribal nations, under the assertion that the pipeline would threaten sacred burial grounds as well as the quality of water in the area.
_	The deflationist response is that the assertion that truth is a norm of assertion can be stated only in the form of the following infinite conjunction:
_	Against the assertion that prisoners were associated with guerrillas operating near the borders, the families submitted the isolation of their relatives from the outside during their detention:
_	An example of this is the assertion that at least six of the suspected hijackers named in the aftermath of the attacks turned up alive, the so-called "zombie hijackers" claim.
_	When part definition is defined mathematically via a solid model, the assertion that one cannot interrogate the model—the direct analog of "scaling the drawing"—becomes ridiculous; because when part definition is defined this way, it is not "possible" for a drawing or model to be "not to scale".
_	A good example would be the assertion that "When an equal amount is taken from equals, an equal amount results."
_	However, the conceptus before implantation exhibits self-actuated activity, which has led to the assertion that it is an embryo.
_	Bishop Michael said that those attending such occasions had been informed of the substitution, but the report "An Abuse of Faith" (sections 4.3.5-4.3.8) found cases where those attending were not informed, adding "we have received no evidence to corroborate the assertion that anyone was ever advised that Peter Ball was attending an event in the place of his brother".
_	There are several, widespread, unproven theories about mosquito control, such as the assertion that vitamin B, in particular B (thiamine), garlic, ultrasonic devices or incense can be used to repel or control mosquitoes.
_	In the first of these papers Bertram Kostant and Sternberg show how reduction techniques enable one to give a rigorous mathematical treatment of what is known in the physics literature as the BRS quantization procedure; in the second, the authors show how one can simplify the analysis of complicated dynamical systems like the Calogero system by describing these systems as symplectic reductions of much simpler systems, and the paper with Victor Guillemin contain the first rigorous formulation and proof of a hitherto vague assertion about group actions on symplectic manifolds; the assertion that "quantization commutes with reduction".
_	The song was co-written by Pete Kirtley, Tim Hawes and Betty Boo (under her real name of Alison Clarkson); however, nearly 14 years after the song was released, Linzi Martin of the band Girl Thing made the assertion that she was responsible for the majority of the song's composition, having written the verses after Pete Kirtley (her then boyfriend) had brought the chorus of the track to her as a gift.
_	Numerous quotes from General Authorities support the assertion that women are fundamentally different from men, not just in their physical bodies, but in their spiritual makeup as well.
_	The tone of the song is bittersweet; the succinct lyrics include the assertion that the divine witnesses human suffering ("he hears the babies crying / he sees the old folks dying") and include the implication that being seen, and loved, might comfort.
_	Historian Barbara Newman finds that there is reason to understand Christina's behavior in terms of hysteria, though Newman fails to account for the assertion that Christina flew from the floor to the rafters of the church after being resurrected from the dead.
_	The underlying philosophy, especially as articulated in an appendix, amounts to the assertion that people generally live their lives asleep, are unconscious of themselves and, accordingly, behave like machines subject to outside causes and pressures.
_	Mormon apologists also allege the assertion that Smith's reconstructions were flawedan assertion that has been put forth by several Egyptologistsis mere speculation that fallaciously presupposes that the Egyptologist interpretation is correct.
_	Some of his most amusing predictions include the assertion that by 2007 ""massive trains and huge cars will fly gracefully"" and ""the secrets of the space as such will be discovered"."
_	Curran suggests that for various reasons the assertion that masturbation involves "objectively grave matter" is not convincing.
_	The protesters contend, and the movie supports, the assertion that the protests were responsible for delaying the licensing of the Diablo Canyon Power Plant and, as a result of the delay, the uncovering of serious construction errors was made public just before the plant went online and started producing power.
_	There were several examples of these, most notably those catalogued in "The Communist Party of Ireland, A Critical History, Part 3" which bewails Murphy's "political inexperience" along with implied egotism behind the assertion that he resigned and emigrated because he could "neither act as Dáil mouthpiece for or national leader of the movement".
_	In the few years before and after 1987, media coverage inflated Prechter's "guru" status to extremes, including the assertion that his forecasts could single-handedly "cause" the stock market to rise or fall.
_	Its style originates with the assertion that “the meaning and purpose of life are to come to know reality,” which is defined as “God”, “Love-Intelligence” or “Infinite Mind.
_	In 2001, a "Billboard Magazine" critic placed the compilation in his "top ten" musical events of the year, noting the relationship between the restaurant franchise and the music produced by it with the assertion that "Buddha Bar is not only a good restaurant in France but also one of the best music experiments to come out of France in the past few years".
_	Furthermore, the assertion that "some eminent scientists" had shown interest in various forms of ESP, obviously, indicates that most scientists are not interested in it, and that widely recognizing of their paranormal nature did not happen.
_	The rationale of this position is the assertion that raising children is a very important activity and so not engaging in this activity must therefore mean living one's life in service to one's self.
_	In addition the assertion that particular formal systems such as Peano arithmetic or ZFC are consistent can be expressed as formula_25 sentences.
_	Holodomor denial is the assertion that the 1932–1933 genocide in Soviet Ukraine either did not occur or did occur but was not a premeditated act.
_	Those who support the new difficulty requirements follow the assertion that they help to progress the sport and improve the overall physical quality of the athletes.
_	In this accounting, baseball was understood as the derivation of an English children's game, rounders, but America was allowed to retain patrimony over its national pastime through the assertion that it had been reinvented as a modern sport by the members of the New York Knickerbockers, who codified its rules for the first time in 1845.
_	It began with the assertion that he had not joined the Bolshevists until late, after the planning of the October Revolution was done.
_	In a similar vein, scholar and activist Judith Butler has challenged the assertion that OWS should make concrete demands:
_	However, studies, such as The Gender Similarities Hypothesis, challenge the assertion that the self-esteem of girls is more significantly reduced at the beginning of adolescence than for boys.
_	In that short presentation he criticized what he called "an article of faith for Republicans:" the assertion that "if taxes on the rich go up, job creation will go down."
_	The Sisters' case rested only secondarily on the assertion that their business would suffer based on the law.
_	The alleged risk of perforation and infection is also part of the assertion that abortion negatively impacts future childbearing, by increasing the risk of infertility, miscarriages, complications, ectopic pregnancy, or fetal health problems.
_	The child's influence and ability to bring sense to her father was seen as cheap theatrics, but ended with the assertion that the film was not second rate for employing such theatrics.
_	Her argument rested on the assertion that these actions "were in harmony with recommendations made by Bother Houteff prior to his death".
_	Among other things, he disputed the assertion that Lowlanders had ever worn tartans or plaids, questioned the lack of any corroborating evidence (including any in Bishop Lesley's writings even though Lesley was said to have been in possession at one time of the original upon which the present MS was based), and called into question the authenticity of the brothers.
_	Many scholars doubt the assertion that it was as far north as the Chesapeake; most place it in present-day Georgia's Sapelo Island.
_	There is also dispute from Don Haigst in an article from the Journal of the American Revolution of the assertion that Heyer crossed the Delaware with Washington.
_	A wildly prolific artist, he is considered one of the most important artists of the new wave of Franco-Belgian comics, though he has rejected the assertion that he, along with artists like Christophe Blain, Marjane Satrapi, and Lewis Trondheim, sought to create an alternative scene or a new movement in comics.
_	The U.S. Department of Health and Human Services on July 8, 2018, and the U.S. Department of State’s Bureau of Western Hemisphere Affairs on July 10, 2018, refuted the allegations, rejecting the assertion that Ambassador Chapman or anyone affiliated with U.S. Embassy Quito threatened Ecuador with trade sanctions or the withdrawal of security assistance related to a resolution at the World Health Assembly.
_	These theories often include the assertion that the events in Jonestown represented CIA efforts in mind control or similar modes of social experimentation, often believed by proponents of such theories to be a covert example of Project MKUltra in practice.
_	Thus the assertion that braided stainless steel hose is superior as compared to a typical rubber hose when used in a hydraulic brake system.
_	Other concerns raised included the assertion that the real danger to I Corps was from a direct threat to Quảng Trị City and other urban areas; that a defense would be pointless as a threat to infiltration, since NVA troops could easily bypass Khe Sanh; that the base was too isolated and that the Marines "had neither the helicopter resources, the troops, nor the logistical bases for such operations".
_	Justice William O. Douglas objected to the assertion that "clean politics" required the act's restrictions: "it would hardly seem to be imperative to muzzle millions of citizens because some of them, if left to their constitutional freedoms, might corrupt the political process."
_	Mawae disagreed with the assertion that his release was for salary cap reasons, as his cut would only be a savings of $1.1 million, and felt that it was simply a change in direction for the team.
_	Against the assertion that Galileo was deceptive in making these arguments, Albert Einstein expressed the opinion that Galileo developed his "fascinating arguments" and accepted them uncritically out of a desire for physical proof of the motion of the Earth.
_	Australian of the Year and AFL player Adam Goodes found the silence about Utopia in mainstream Australia and the assertion that the film doesn't show the good or other side of Aboriginal Australia disturbing and hurtful and wrote in "The Sydney Morning Herald" that "Utopia has shown me how, over 225 years, the Europeans, and now the governments that run our country, have raped, killed and stolen from my people for their own benefit.
_	There were seven reasons argued to support the motion; among these was the assertion that the ordinance violated the rights alleged to be secured to the accused by the constitution of the state, and by the Fourteenth Amendment.
_	A person sentenced for a crime related to the mafia or terrorism is ineligible for "libertà condizionata" unless he cooperates with the authorities, but some critics argue that it's hard to know what evidence might support the assertion that ties of this sort have, in fact, been broken.
_	The assertion that quadrilateral A is a square is equivalent to the assertion that the diagonals of A are equal and perpendicular to each other.
_	One of the main threats the Nazis used against Furtwängler and myself later on was the assertion that they had recorded all these conversations.
_	Though critical of Hegel’s logical necessitarianism that every dialectical conflict can be resolved only by way of synthesis, Seung does not reject the assertion that thematic resolutions may be determined by historical causes and conditions operating on the thematic conflicts.
_	Thieme built his ministry on the assertion that believers in Jesus Christ must learn the Word of God to know the will of God for their lives and to execute the plan of God for their lives.
_	The disparaging remarks about the stadtholderate in this work, which amounted to the assertion that princes (and by implication stadtholders) have an interest in keeping the world in perpetual conflict, because they wield more influence in such circumstances, incensed the Orangist public.
_	Some courts have also rejected the assertion that the availability of caller information makes 911 calls inherently reliable.
_	Referring to the assertion that the tape reveals the order, Shafer went on to say, "That's not to say there may not have been, but with all the racket and noise, I don't know how anyone could have heard anything that day."
_	The controversy is usually based on the assertion that the term originally meant someone messing about with something in a positive sense, that is, using playful cleverness to achieve a goal.
_	Cleveland's defeat of his chief opponent, James G. Blaine, may have been helped by another discrediting tactic used against him which seriously backfired, namely the assertion that Cleveland's party was that of "Rum, Romanism, and Rebellion" (the latter two referring to Roman Catholicism and the American Civil War).
_	Irrespective of the assertion that the place has seen continuous human habitation since ancient times, for many scholars and historians, the place was a vast wilderness almost till early medieval times.
_	In contrast, "constructivism is an epistemological premise grounded on the assertion that, in the act of knowing, it is the human mind that actively gives meaning and order to that reality to which it is responding".
_	The Brahmana 4 in the first chapter, announces the Upanishad's non-dual, monistic metaphysical premise that Atman and Brahman are identical Oneness, with the assertion that because the universe came out of nothingness when the only principle existent was "I am he", the universe after it came into existence continues as "Aham brahma asmi" (I am Brahman).
_	<br>Metro-land further entered the public psyche with the song "My Little Metro-land Home" (lyrics by Boyle Lawrence and music by Henry Thraile, 1920), while another ditty extolled the virtues of the Poplars estate at Ruislip with the assertion that "It's a very short distance by rail on the Met/And at the gate you'll find waiting, sweet Violet".
_	It is argued that under physicalism, one must either believe that anyone including oneself might be a zombie, or that no one can be a zombie—following from the assertion that one's own conviction about being (or not being) a zombie is a product of the physical world and is therefore no different from anyone else's.
_	Dr. Martin Fackler, a Vietnam-era trauma surgeon, wound ballistics researcher, a Colonel in the U.S. Army and the head of the Wound Ballistics Laboratory for the U.S. Army’s Medical Training Center, Letterman Institute, claimed that hydrostatic shock had been disproved and that the assertion that a pressure wave plays a role in injury or incapacitation is a myth.
_	Critics of PACs say it allows special interests to wield too much influence in Congress; proponents dispute the assertion that PACs represent narrow constituencies.
_	There is no support in the economics for the assertion that immigrants suppress wages and take jobs from Americans; to the contrary, research by Lewis and several other economists of migration shows that diverse and low-skilled immigrants lift the wages of native-born workers, as those immigrants are less substitutable to native-born workers.
_	Nevertheless, he said that the study cast "a considerable doubt on the assertion that mystical experiences catalyzed by drugs are in any way inferior to non-drug mystical experiences in both their immediate content and long-term effects".
_	The second law is also expressed as the assertion that in an isolated system, entropy never decreases.
_	However, Brown writes that there is actually no truth in the assertion that the work was written to be dedicated to Rubinstein.
_	Nonetheless, some genealogical and historical sources continue to make the assertion that she was the Conqueror's daughter.
_	He dismissed criticism of his negotiations with Labor with the assertion that his plan was for the good of the community, and transcended party politics.
_	The Chapter 2 opens with a praise and wonders of "Khechari" knowledge, with the assertion that "one who has mastered this, is devoid of aging and mortality" and free from the suffering from diseases.
_	Under the last-named he acquired great stores of practical and theoretical knowledge (Yer. Niddah ii. 50b), and so developed his dialectical powers that once in the heat of debate with his senior and former teacher Ḥiyya he ventured the assertion that were some law forgotten, he could himself reestablish it by argumentation (Ket. 103b).
_	He recruited Jenna with the assertion that Charlotte left enough money in her will to afford Marshall another eye surgery.
_	An op-ed of the "Washington Post" made the assertion that Castle's loss marked the end of the party legacy of Nelson Rockefeller.
_	Her dissertation, "Feelin Feminism: Black Women's Art as Feminist Thought ," is an analysis of how various oppressions that affect black women are felt, and makes the assertion that Black Women's creative process and output is a site of feminist and womanist thought.
_	The Siri thesis is the assertion that Cardinal Giuseppe Siri, the conservative Archbishop of Genoa since 1946, was elected pope in the 1958 papal conclave, taking the name "Pope Gregory XVII", but that his election was then suppressed.
_	However, the assertion that Morrison was employed by Pepper, and named the drink after him, is disputed.
_	However, in some jurisdictions a manufacturer may raise as a legal defense the assertion that their product represents the "state of the art", and that the manufacturer therefore could not have made the product any safer in light of the knowledge available at the time.
_	He went on to point out some of the concepts underpinning human ecology towards the social problems facing his readers in the 1950s as well as the assertion that human nature cannot change, what this statement could mean, and whether it is true.
_	This continuous and supposedly linear historiography includes the assertion that the modern ethnic Macedonians are direct descendants of the Ancient Macedonians.
_	But the caliber of these opponents was far beneath the class of the men he had met previously, and press reports were unanimous in the assertion that his form had deteriorated markedly.
_	This view is complemented by the assertion that “the characteristic feature of a modern [that is, post-industrial] society is that it is a technocracy.”
_	This has led to the assertion that aviation represents a "net negative effect" on the UK tourism industry, and that restraining demand for air travel would encourage more domestic tourism, with the consequent economic benefit of reducing the tourism deficit.
_	Among the various criticisms it receives, one of the most recurrent is the assertion that it could discourage the search for employment, encouraging laziness.
_	Contained within is the assertion that Starkey bribed a guard and that the guard left the rope and the bucket for Starkey to climb which is also at odds with reporting from Phelps' 1844 publication and Hubbard's 1907 description of Starkey's capture and fatal escape.
_	Veach said that the assertion that Williams was Kentucky's first distiller did not appear until an 1892 publication by Reuben Durrett, more than a century after the fact.
_	and this inequality is equivalent to the assertion that "bx" < 1.
_	Among the interesting features of this version of the flood myth, are the identification, through "interpretatio graeca", of the Sumerian god Enki with the Greek god Cronus, the father of Zeus; and the assertion that the reed boat constructed by Xisuthros survived, at least until Berossus' day, in the "Corcyrean Mountains" of Armenia.
_	The Supreme Court found no support for the assertion that the statute only bound customs officers' classifications, and not the importer's themselves.
_	The theory departs from the assertion that Hegel’s system is meant to be a systematic account of how every dialectical conflict is reconciled through the synthesis of thesis and antithesis.
_	According to Hughes, the ideology "stems from the assertion that human beings will generally be happier when they take rational control of the natural and social forces that control their lives."
_	Hence, some of the following information may seem a bit contradictory, especially if the assertion that two names are "synonyms" is misconstrued as an assertion that the two names mean exactly the same thing.
_	What makes the assertion that Preston Watson built a glider, or any aircraft in 1903 questionable is that James Watson publicly contradicts himself on more than one occasion.
_	Sullivan's arguments for marriage included the assertion that it was a good defense against the spread of HIV and AIDS; Rotello argued similarly that these diseases could not be eradicated so long as a 'core group' of gay men participated in risky sex.
_	This was also accompanied by the assertion that Chucho did not use violence in his crimes and even “vowed not to kill.
_	The argument asserting the heretical nature of this statement relies on the assertion that this promise ignores and rejects all tradition, scripture, and the teachings of the Magisterium (e.g. cf.) on the subject of salvation.
_	ETA’s ceasefire video ended with the assertion that the struggle for the Basque homeland continues.
_	In the following issue, P. Dunn of Indiana University, Bloomington, rebuted the assertion that Tassinong could be derived from Tassement.
_	Justice Ashworth commented that this formulation did not seem to support at all the assertion that Scientology was a religion; rather, it came across more as "a meeting point for persons of all religious beliefs, through which they might better appreciate their spiritual character."
_	He delighted above all in ecclesiastical compositions, and these display a remarkable contrapuntal style and bear witness to the skill of the composer, justifying indeed the assertion that, in the sixteenth century and prior to Palestrina, Borgia was one of the chief restorers of sacred music.
_	All of his pieces also display a childish and playful nature, with a touch of femininity and a sense of ironic politeness, which leads to the assertion that he was a preemptive cute formalist.
_	Upon observing the creature's corpse, Denham famously rejected the assertion that the planes had killed him.
_	The challenge is based on the assertion that the plan fails to meet the requirements of the Zoning Code, which is a prerequisite to conditional use approval.
_	But it seems to us likely that the assertion that Marcus counted a second or a third Hysterema is but an inference drawn by Irenaeus himself ( 3, p. 83), from the fact that he found the name "karpos hysterematos" applied not only to the Demiurge, but to his mother, Sophia Achamoth.
_	In the European Values Study (EVS) of 2008, the percentage of Spanish respondents who agreed with the assertion that "Marriage is an outdated institution" was 31.2%.
_	CWA director emeritus Jim Palmer wrote this guest opinion for the Camera in response to the assertion that the CWA had never had a strategic plan.
_	The Fletchers supported this criticism, but their complaint at the dilapidated state of the company's plant, and in particular the coal waggons, was met by the company secretary with the assertion that the problem was not with the waggons, but with the Fletchers' habitual over-loading of them.
_	Thirdly, Lord Mansfield rejected the assertion that a court's judgment could not be revised by a new action; "Money may be recovered by a right and legal judgment; and yet the iniquity of keeping that money may be manifest, upon grounds which could not be used by way of defence against the judgment."
_	The 1741 "Hochverdiente…" is an examination of the assertion that Johann Gutenberg was indeed the inventor of movable type – the printing press – against competing claims.
_	Even the leading advocates of animal rights seem to have shrunk from basing their claim on the only argument which can ultimately be held to be a really sufficient one—the assertion that animals, as well as men, though, of course, to a far less extent than men, are possessed of a distinctive individuality, and, therefore, are in justice entitled to live their lives with a due measure of that 'restricted freedom' to which Herbert Spencer alludes.
_	In that case, however, Joseph could not have farmed the Egyptian taxes, since Cœle-Syria was then under Syrian, and not under Egyptian, suzerainty, while the assertion that the two powers had divided the revenues of the country is merely an attempt on the part of Josephus to evade the difficulty.
_	The Ulbricht Doctrine, named after East German leader Walter Ulbricht, was the assertion that normal diplomatic relations between East Germany and West Germany could occur only if both states fully recognised each other's sovereignty.
_	The RSAA ruled on a refugee claim in 1999 where it was held that any claim based on the assertion that Chinese Indonesians are at risk of persecution by virtue of their race alone is bound to fail and that the discrimination experienced by Chinese Indonesians does not rise to the level of persecution.
_	Additional objections settle specifically around the assertion that a seatbelt is a medical device, and because one is entitled to make their own medical decisions they should also be permitted to make their own decisions about wearing a seatbelt.
_	Hugh has generally been identified with the assertion that one can rise to God by love alone, without any cognition accompanying or leading the way.
_	Ex-cult watchdog John Bowen Brown II and "Knocking" producer Joel P. Engardio also reject the assertion that Jehovah's Witnesses is a cult.
_	Extremely optimistic forecasts were circulated by the promoters, including the assertion that the line would form part of an artery to the North of England from Bristol, when the Severn Tunnel was opened.
_	The main problems are a lack of good transitional forms, the apparent existence of authentic "Torosaurus" subadults, different skull proportions independent of maturation and the assertion that hole formation at an adult stage is not part of a normal ceratopsian maturation sequence.
_	The history of the settlement now known as Agoo dates back even further, with both documentary and artifactual evidence supporting the assertion that it was a major port of call for foreign traders before it was formally established by the Spaniards.
_	One important distinction between the post Constantine I (reigned AD 306–337) emperors and their pagan predecessors was cesaropapism, the assertion that the Emperor (or other head of state) is also the head of the Church.
_	Philips (2011) writes, " ... a major criticism of such physical SCP strategies has been the threat of crime displacement, and the assertion that the foreclosure of one type of criminal opportunity (will) simply shift the incidence of crime to different forms, times and locales" (Repetto, 1976:167).
_	However, the truth of the assertion that the sum of two left nil ideals is again a left nil ideal remains elusive; it is an open problem known as the Köthe conjecture.
_	Other scholars believe that "adna al-jilbab" means 'make it hang low' rather than wrap around and thus do not support the assertion that women must cover their heads.
_	Georg Wilhelm Friedrich Hegel begins his exposition of desire in "Phenomenology of Spirit" with the assertion that "self-consciousness is the state of desire () in general."
_	Ip contested the assertion that the 500,000 demonstrators took to the streets because of Article 23 legislation alone.
_	To further support the assertion that emotional expression results from action of subcortical centers, Cannon and Britton performed further experimental research with cats.
_	Blavatsky repeatedly returned to the assertion that modern physical sciences point to the same reality as the esoteric doctrines:
_	Moussa Ahmed Idriss and the ODU later challenged the results based on election "irregularities" and the assertion that "foreigners" had voted in various districts of the capital; however, international and locally based observers considered the election to be generally fair, and cited only minor technical difficulties.
_	It was in this book that Churchill first made the assertion that the United States distributed "smallpox-infested blankets" to Indian tribes, an assertion which he repeated several times over the next decade.
_	Kahn recruited Jenna with the assertion that Charlotte left enough money in her will to afford Marshall another eye surgery.
